Devon: You don’t know that…technology and stuff…you just might go to the moon.
With its whimper of welcome, is stilled (how still!)
Anyway it has been retrieved now and even though some of the names were a bit soggy - Ebenezer does tend to saliva when he gets excited we were able to read the name of this week's winner.
DIVISION
I have a personal camera but I usually I don't know where my camera is, or I leave it at home when I need it. The photo card is super small and I needed an adapter so I could put my card into the computer. That worked for awhile too, but now not so much. I'm not sure why, but the computer isn't reading the card anymore.
The poster I made wasn't a million miles away from these posters above, it wasn't particularly beautiful, it certainly wasn't a piece of art. But it was simple and compelling, and effective.
‘What is the name of the maker?’ he said.
2-3 tortilla
Further services available here.
and there is no song I could sing
In solidarity with the MAS program, in solidarity with the thousands of young students who are now forbidden from learning about their own heritage in schools, I’m going to read the banned books. All of them (the list starts on page 116). Consider this post the official beginning of one of my long-term reading projects.
a clue that they were just that, “story tellers”.
Anyway, I'm off topic! We are also holding off because with Christmas coming up and running behind on Brian's paycheck from someone he did side work for we are a bit broke! And our best option is IUI. Lucky us, we get to spend $1000 each cycle we try to get pregnant and with only an 18% success rate each cycle. And a 75% chance they'll be able to get Leftie to drop an egg. We don't care what the right one does but Leftie better be on her game!
Another approach to regain lost downforce was the re-invention in 2010 of the exhaust blown diffuser (EBD). This used high energy exhaust gasses to blow the diffuser, the faster throughput of flow under the floor increased downforce. Two methods of EBDs were used in 2010, one blowing over the diffuser and the second blowing inside the diffuser. This latter solution was more effective at driving flow through the diffuser and created more downforce. However this necessitated a hole made into the diffuser to allow the exhaust gas to enter, I‘ve termed this method an ‘open fronted diffuser‘.
We set sail for St Pete's early tomorrow morning. For most of next week I'll be out of email and phone contact so apologies for any unanswered messages or blog comments that go unpublished (I have to keep comment moderation on because of the immense volume of spam - I'll check up whenever I have a signal).
In early August, E&O’s shares galloped to a three-year high of RM1.75 on the back of the SP Setia merger rumours, then came down again in line with the global stock slump. Yet, amid the broader market sell-down a few weeks later, its stock again saw aggressive trading, this time from its own shareholders who appeared to be upping their stake.
This is the ladies room. Its in pink!
Today, the US Food and Drug Administration (FDA) could rightfully be accused of being a “subsidiary” of the Monsanto Company. When you realize just how many Monsanto executives and employees who have migrated into positions of power within the FDA and other government agencies, a truly disturbing picture emerges of the foxes guarding the henhouse.
But life moves on, and in two weeks I’ll be flying to Florence to have a whole ‘nother set of new experiences. Italy! I’ve never been, but I hear the food’s excellent.
Add chicken broth,milk, yogurt, onion powder, black pepper and salt to flour, mixing until well blended and cook until thickened.
COLD MOUNTAIN should be set down from time to time while being read. It was
So, a Francesca Woodman´s photograph,
I originally had a different post intended for today, but my weekend ended up being busier than I anticipated...which is definitely not a bad thing! I'll have that post for you later in the week, but for now I want to talk awards season fashion!
-I find that cloth diapers work so much better at containing messes. That is a huge benefit. We used disposable diapers briefly when our son was born, trying to use up some of the diapers that were given to us. They leaked all the time. I do less laundry since switching full time to cloth because I don't have to change my son's clothes every time I change his diaper like I had to when he was wearing
½ teaspoon baking soda
ZeroWater is sponsoring a giveaway for one lucky Wendi's Book Corner reader! One reader will win a ZeroWater 10-Cup Water Pitcher, which goes way beyond normal water filter pitchers to filter out almost ALL total dissolved solids that can be found in your drinking water. Taste water the way it was meant to be... Pure
For the year 2010, the government approved a budget of RM149 billion for operating expenditure (opex).
What they have done
witness to the saga’s endless soul road –
The book’s closure ends with two poems, both revolving around light. In the final poem, Klein offers what a brilliant poem should: an opening for more. I don’t think too many poets have the courage to offer as much white space, a welcoming of light.
I asked them. And guess what? They laughed. They didn't care. They put their arms around me and said, "it's just a car, Mom. Who cares?"
10. Sew a dress.
My fury runs deep to the Earths core
These agencies are actually those agencies which regulate the banks, and financial sectors who make mortgage loans. But, as always in the nation's housing system; there will be exemptions. There always is. With the FDIC set to vote and clarify today, the rule for exemptions for Risk Retention Rules and exactly what a 'Qualified Residential Mortgage' is. There are also hearings about the future of housing going on at Capitol Hill. Most of American's are saying it is about time as we have been into this process way to long now and stability for the housing industry nor the economy has taken place. Of course the banks have more portfolio than their share to get rid of since the HAMP Modification has not been a huge success.
In case any of the 600+ Chiefs can't attend the AFN AGM and election, and they are looking for someone to be their voting proxy, try sending one of our million grass-roots folks.
Next morning I didn't pack it in so much. I packed the deep wound part, but the rest I frosted. Seriously this stuff is about as thick as cold can cake icing. It goes on about as well too! You can cover once, but if you try to go back and touch up all your "pretty" pulls back onto your spoon or spatula. I should be able to frost cakes quite well when I get through doing this.
Running (Long) for (Big) Change
Well, here we are - Christmas Eve and time to begin the celebrations. I'm sorry for my absence of late - I've been having trouble with my arthritis and it has made it very difficult for me to craft this time. But I've had some good news today - I shall be getting new drugs in January and we are very hopeful for their success.
Like that overwhelmed server in a busy restaurant, I am so far behind in my garden that our green customers have overwhelmed me and are attacking. Well, so what if I'm in the weeds in my garden? Maybe I want to be the oldest kind of garden designer of all, not a farmer, but the kind of person who let's nature grow up against her. It just so happens I'm in a city though, but I'm not afraid of the chaos of nature and you shouldn't be either. We've been mimicking her since to dawn of man and I'd rather mimic her than the newest garden design fads.
With Vertigo—and this is what the film’s third act brilliantly drives home—Hitchcock essentially tells a tale of our relationship to the movies. We all look to be seduced by images the way our hero Scottie Ferguson (James Stewart) becomes bewitched by the image of Madeleine as he stakes her out. Sometimes we even dive so far into that image that so attracts us that we, in essence, become deeply involved in it, as Scottie becomes emotionally involved with Madeleine; we think about it all the time and maybe even try to understand what lies behind both the image and our own fascination with it. Eventually, though, there is a point in which images simply can’t measure up to reality. In Vertigo, the “death” of Madeleine is the death of an image—but when a devastated Scottie meets the real woman behind Gavin Elster’s carefully manipulated Madeleine image, the increasingly obsessive detective refuses to grasp the human being underneath, preferring that image that so enraptured him in the first place. And the fact that he is willing to essentially recreate a human being just to satisfy his image-driven lust is the source of the film’s unsettling power. Eventually, Scottie realizes the folly of his ways... but by then, it is too late, and he loses both the image and the person.
My facebook peeps kinda know some of it, divorce, moving out on my own for the first time in my life, delving back into the world of being single and learning to live again. I have since smashed through my first goal to lose 50 pounds. woot woot!! I have never felt so damn ALIVE! In an effort to discover and become who I truely am, I have dyed my hair, pierced my face and tattooed my torso. WHAAAA?! Yup, this chick is off her rocker....lol. But hey, its my time. And for those of you who followed me way back when, just thought I would give the final update - no more pre-cancer cells either :) BIG HAPPY FACES HERE!
Mr. Dahl: "No"
Yesterday, I explained how I made my own blog button in Pixlr. I really love Pixlr because it's free and it can do a ton of things. I used it to create my button and header. I've been playing around with it a lot and starting to become more comfortable with the program. It's a lot of fun (and sometimes a great source of frustration, if I'm being completely honest). But since we're losing Picnik (which was so user-friendly), learning a new program is essential. I'll share more of my Pixlr creations soon. I'll even show you how I made my header (and how I centered it, and eliminated the padding, etc). But, today I'm going to show you how to install a blog button in blogger. I'll give you step-by-step instructions for putting it in your sidebar, so others can take it!
He is informed:
Having all these cores makes me want to try out Haiku, which is an open source BeOS clone. I don’t know how it’ll run on all the modern hardware, but I’m willing to give it a shot.
Don’t waffle
When you need to remember God writes your story:
Visceral punk fury.
Tony later came in and shared a bong and some conversation on the music scene. Good people.
I asked him why they lit up the way they did.
The late Serbian writer Milorad Pavic (author of Dictionary of the Khazars and many other volumes), believed in novels taking many other forms - dictionaries, acrostics, nonlineqar works, books with 100 possible endings. Prescient, he also was interested in the novel as computer file or program.
Basically I mixed an adequate amount of ricotta with honey (mmm), cooked the fritters and topped them basil pesto then plated it all up.
Despite all I have said thus far, I think it’s not a good idea, among other reasons because some people are so pig-headed that if they don’t want to get divorced, they’ll simply refuse to finish things up in an agreement, since they don’t want to be forced to get a lawyer. There are certainly any number of cases I have finished by being able to win the trust of the other side enough that they will meet with me and my client, and we can manage to formulate a fair and reasonable agreement.
Nate: Yeah.
increase and I may decrease,…
Here’s the message you receive if you attempt to access the internet once your allowance is used up:
2 cups of brown rice, picked through and placed in long, glass baking dish.
To celebrate the season, we bring you The Lewis Carroll Memorial Window at Daniell Chapel in England. Notice the left panel where Lewis Carroll and Alice kneel to pay homage to the newly born Christ in this wonderful Nativity scene! This month's quote is actually contained within the windows, do you see it?
But exactly how bad a job do they do compared to self-pubbers?
It takes courage to stand up to the status quo, toe-the-line, “now play nicely by our rules” crowd.
Whenever I cook a ham, I'm left with odds and ends that don't add up to much, but I don't want to waste. That's when I make these yummy open-faced sandwiches. I eyeball the ingredient measurements and use what I have on hand -- odds and ends of cheese, various mustards, sometimes something onion-y, sometimes not. Just be sure to use a sturdy, flavorful bread. I especially like this with Dakota bread from Great Harvest Bread Company (which we Rochesterians knew originally as Montana Mills).
987 **D-X/6/1987. “Church and State Today: Reason Versus Revelation Reconsidered.” Rosary College, River Forest, Illinois. (Incorporated in Item C-2001(6), above, pp. 470-75.)
Once in a blue moon, a show captivates me, I put down the books, and I become an addict. This occurred with Sex and the City, The Sopranos, and more recently, Mad Men.
Is hung with bloom along the bough,
bicycle somewhere far—pumping,
I know a song that’ll get on your nerves,
Roky Erickson - I Have Always Been Here Before: The Anthology - 2005
Everyone my age knows who Freddy Krueger was. Hell, most people know who Freddy is, even if they've never seen the movies. But the 80's.. it was Freddy's decade. As a child in the 80's (and when I say child, I mean I was 5 in 1988), I was terrified of this man that could come into my dreams and kill me, and my parents couldn't do anything about it. And he was EVERYWHERE. Freddy Krueger ruled the world at Halloween, and those movies played all the time: night time, middle of the afternoon, whenever. I even remember when I was moving to Florida, we drove down and spent the night in a hotel... We left the television on, and when I woke up randomly at 3 in the morning, I remember seeing a scene with lockers and a big red claw mark across them (I think this was from Nightmare on Elm Street 4)..
The plus side of being Properly Poorly is that I’ve been forced to slow down and catch up with some reading. Briefly:
By: Shel Silverstein
Little did I know that when I made my first pilgrimage to Medjugorje in 1985 that I would find myself drawn to return again and again. This past June I made another pilgrimage to spend two weeks in prayer and reflection. I had the joy of being present for the 26th anniversary of the apparitions and attending the priest's retreat. However, this is the first time that I am writing a reflection on my experience in Medjugorje. A good friend of mine, Mate, suggested that it was time for me to start writing about my experiences. Actually his exact words were, "Yo, Father don't you think its time to start writing about all that has happened to you!" (By the way, unlike me who only speaks English and a bit of Spanish, my friend was able to ask me the same question in 5 different languages! ) I was touched by his invitation and sat down to write this reflection. When I was studying theology as I was preparing to be ordained a Jesuit priest, I learned that "symbols/signs (given by God) have an excess of meaning." This insight came alive again this past June while I was in Medjugorje for the anniversary of the apparition and the priest's retreat (this trip was either my ninth or tenth trip - I have lost count - now instead of counting how many times I have been, I thank the Blessed Mother for her loving invitation to come and stay!) Undoubtedly, the extraordinary symbol that we are given in Medjugorje is that the Blessed Mother has been appearing here for the past twenty six years. We must understand that the Blessed Mother always points us to a greater sign than herself. She always draws us to her Son. In Medjugorje, we are truly given a gift because Mary calls us to her Son through the sacraments. As a priest, I am touched and moved when I see pilgrims returning to the Eucharist and to confession. I find that when I celebrate mass and hear confessions, I experience a little bit of heaven. As a sinner myself, I often feel unworthy when I am listening to pilgrims during confession and they generously open their hearts and their lives to me. It is through the sacraments of the Eucharist and Confession that we are given the grace to be healed and to courageously become signs to the world of God's fidelity and love. This is one of the many graces that exist in Medjugorje - the grace to be a sign like our Blessed Mother. If we live and embrace the messages of Medjugorje we too will point other people to Jesus. This time in Medjugorje, I had a feeling of being at home. I was no longer a visitor...I was returning home...home where I would experience peace and be filled with awe and wonder. This feeling of being at home began the minute I arrived. Within minutes of my arrival I was given the gift of being present for an apparition. I have experienced this gift many times, but this time, while I was kneeling and praying I had a sense that Mary wanted me to again open my heart to how God would use me during my stay. This feeling of being at home is both a grace and a challenge. Since, when you are at home you can no longer sit on the side lines and wait for God to act. When you are at home you are called to labor with God. When you are at home you are called to live the Gospel with all your mind, heart and soul. There are so many stories that I can share of my time in Medjugorje, so many experiences of God's love and Mary's presence that even thinking of them makes me feel humble and grateful! However, let me share with you one experience of how God works through our Blessed Mother. During my two weeks in Medjugorje, I had been praying to celebrate mass for the Cenacolo community. As a matter of fact, I had started praying for this even before I arrived in Medjugorje. As circumstances were in Medjugorje, it appeared that my prayer was not going to be answered, since during my first week I was not asked to celebrate mass and during my second week there were plenty of priests present for the retreat. The Cenacolo community had many priests to celebrate mass for them. As my time in Medjugorje was drawing to a close I had resigned myself to the fact that I would not be celebrating mass for the Cenacolo community.
It filled & ran perfectly - it isn't called a "SmartDrive" for nothing .
“His persecution has been facilitated by another champion of double-talk, the government of Malaysia, which claims to respect the rule of law but bundled Mr Kashgari onto a private Saudi jet Sunday in spite of a court order prohibiting his deportation,” said the Washington Post.
I refuse to even rate this album on a scale of 1-5.
I also discovered chalk markers! I use these all the time now.
I lift weights because it's a challenge to my body and helps me lean out and get strong.
my bags half-spilled out around me.
I was not successful.
Jallat Khan and Shahzada Khan, both 16, stalked the woman as she left a nightclub, and then pounced on her as she walked along Fish Street in Leeds city centre.
Chance had his first deer tick today, it was not stuck, it was just crawling in his fur. We saw Robins in town but none out here yet. Although “she who sees robins first” probably saw them last week.
Just imagine.
Collecting millions from Wall Street was hardly the plan Obama and Holder telegraphed upon entering office. In 2009, the new Attorney General said boldly:
Beth’s Chicken Pie
I always have to remember the good days as it gets me through the bad ones.
Ross says:
I took my seat next to Kate Murr, who was up next. She explained that a friend had given her a book of poetry titled, “Emily Dickinson Love Poems” and that she had never thought of Dickinson’s poetry as potenial love poetry. We agreed with that. After talking a bit about the life of this long dead wordsmith she told us she had some poems written after the style of E.D.
You know it’s going to be a good day with a 3 year superhero old bursts into your room at 7 in the morning, (after you’ve probably only been asleep for an hour) and shouts “watch out everyone, I’m superglue”!
Misc: Recollection Pearls
this is what I made so far, I attached the sphere of clay to the thigh, I will show photos of how to do it next time because the clay is messy (laugh) it will ruin mg camera!it's not easy to take pics while my hands are messed up by clay^.^
In their opening speeches, both talked of focusing on achieving clear research outcomes and timeframes with direct impact on the development of agroforestry.
That means there is nothing at all to say that smoking causes cot death except for a belief that it does.
A person is guilty of obstructing governmental administration when he intentionally obstructs, impairs or perverts the administration of law or other governmental function or prevents or attempts to prevent a public servant from performing an official function, by means of intimidation, physical force or interference, or by means of any independently unlawful act, or by means of interfering, whether or not physical force is involved, with radio, telephone, television or other telecommunications systems owned or operated by the state, or a county, city, town, village, fire district or emergency medical service or by means of releasing a dangerous animal under circumstances evincing the actor’s intent that the animal obstruct governmental administration. Obstructing governmental administration is a class A misdemeanor.
The one-sidedness goes back to the issue of excessively positive portrayals of Islam, compromising on real critique and deeper perspective – the “kid gloves” issue. The notion of kids spending their summers devoted to memorising the Quran, syllable by syllable: this sort of devout, all-encompassing religiosity discomforts a lot of us, and yet it was given a free pass here under the guise of Culture. More than that, it was given a positive spin: The Light in Her Eyes, really? If this film had been about Christianity, it would’ve been pariahed in the spirit of Jesus Camp. Not questioning, not thinking, just nodding along.
Makes about 5 dozen, depending on size of cookies.
resetting attitude and mentality towards
It’s beautiful, cheap and packed with culture – Connie and I visited in 2010 and are going back this year – and Hungarian food is fantastic.
~Share something imperfect to a small group of people you trust. Put your name on it proudly. For bonus points admit that you were hoping it would be better, but it didn’t quite work out, and ask for constructive feedback or explain what you would like to improve on your next attempt. See how kind (or at the very least indifferent!) people are to the flaws in your work.
Needing a new character, he rolled up a rather pathetic set of scores, and decided to give a shot at playing a half-orc fighter named Gog. He entered the picture as a slave of the Dwarves at the dwarven citadel north of Headwaters (which the party eventually did finally find). A lot of fun was had as this new character was introduced into the party.
Joerg Fischer – The Boss, who else! Tnx for the continued friendship, keep in touch!
One post, with pictures of lighthouses, here has been getting an avalanche of hits all from the same google-image referrer, and all of the hits come from isps in Germany, Austria, and Switzerland.
I think we all assume that our spouses will respond one way when we tell them we don't agree with them, but when it comes down to it, they may very well respond differently.
This is defiantly one to read.
I even write letters sometimes.
After today, I will officially let myself focus on the Christmas season. And my family. And my home.
Perhaps the problem is that, now Murdoch effectively owns the FA, they’re on some sweet deal from him to screw up England’s chances of ever winning anything again….old Wrinkly Roop’s main obsession being the destruction of all things English.
The source of Cremins’ envy? The three teams the CAA sent to the NCAA tournament last season, and the four at-large bids the Colonial has landed in the last six seasons. That’s four more at-large bids than the SoCon has earned it its entire history dating back to 1939, when the NCAA tournament started.
It is easy to breathe in.
Hina asked her mother to sit beside her. Taking mother’s hand in hers Hina said: “I had died. But I could hear my mother weep so resentfully that I begged almighty to grant me few days more to console my mother. Believe me two angels forcefully pulling my soul on my resistance. With all my strength I fell on my dead body. My shoulders still ache of their strong grip. I couldn’t speak but could hear every word and comments by each one of you when I lay dead. I have been granted just few days to live. I request you all specially my mother to please do not cry when I die again. I have to go.” Every one in the room was flabbergasted.
This simple layering technique works for me because I tend to favor dresses cut in simple, sheath silhouettes. This allows for any number of tops to be put over the dress and prevents any weird bunching from going on. While this works best when the skirt is also fairly form-fitting, I've been surprised at how many dresses with full skirts that I've been able to use with all of these techniques.
England is Hodgson’s 21st job in what has been a nomadic career, that has taken in six countries to boast a wealth of experience that, as the FA constantly reminded us on Tuesday, nobody else in the running for the job came close to possessing. Not Jose Mourinho, not Pep Guardiola and certainly not Harry Redknapp who were all on the list of the marquee appointment before Hodgson was and those ingrained in the pro-Redknapp camp will do well to come into conversion to that notion in the next 39 days that seperate now to England’s first Euro 2012 game with France.
What does all of this self-reflection mean? First and foremost, I am going to get back to being this runner. I craved running at this point in my life and it brought me happiness, peace of mind and some killer leg muscles! Second, in my mind admitting I will most likely be running around a 11:00 min mile pace for the 25k screamed NOT GOOD!* I am erasing this message from my brain! I am going to run 15 miles! I am going to celebrate this feat rather than concentrating on my time. Third, I am going to allow myself time to improve and train well. I’ve got a crazy fun Ragnar Relay coming up in June, a Mud Run right before that and then the 1/2 marathon in July. (Oh yeah, and the NIKE FULL!) I want to do well in all of these but most of all I.WANT.TO.HAVE.FUN.
Sunday afternoon, Manly out of the blue, decided that we should go out to dinner.
The fire service was alerted at 11.27am on that morning and four units from Leixlip and Maynooth fire services were sent to the scene. There were several thousand secondary school students on the campus at that time for an open day and they stood with staff and under-graduates in shock and disbelief,as the restaurant was destroyed.
Comunque sono perfettamente d'accordo col motto:
Ham/Cheddar
The fam-damily waited for me at an out-and-back loop.
“Usually the only fight about these things is finding a way to pay for it,” he said.
We are not huge on celebrating Valentines Day....since it is just a few days after my birthday it seems to fall through the cracks after birthday festivities. We normally do a little something to celebrate and exchange a small thoughtful gift and that is enough for us! I do love the idea of a day that encourages you to tell your loved one how much you love them!
To help make this point and raise other questions with our viewers, I have selected works by three of the top conceptual artists in the field of contemporary Japanese ceramics, all on loan from Jeffrey and Carol Horvitz. In our contemporary ceramics case, located on the lobby level of the Pavilion for Japanese Art, I’ve placed a sculpture by Akiyama Yo with stacks of tea bowls crushed under the weight of compacted clay. One imagines this mangled stack to resemble the findings of archaeologists digging now in Kyoto, as they unearth the remains of seventeenth-century kilns. Hoshino Satoru’s work, by contrast, is a precious tea bowl, which a tea practitioner would carefully lift to inspect and remark upon before drinking from it during the course of a tea ceremony. If not for the good outcome from the kiln, Hoshino’s bowl might be found generations later in the same form depicted in Akiyama’s sculpture!
I'm going to pull myself up by my bootstraps (or maybe it is my shoelaces) and get a grip. I can do this. I'm a big girl (I think?). I didn't expect this to be so hard. The truth is, the processes of the past 7 weeks have all be hard. I just kept going through it, trying not to feel or think...just stay busy..keep working...I kept telling myself. Now I have to get real and face this. Right now, I'm torn between two lives and the memories of home that are forever changed.
Calls came in from our son in North Carolina and our daughter in Brooklyn, New York. It was so good t hear their voices.
5 minutes into the flight.
“Simon. I’m employed by Principal Sal, and a student. You must be Star?” I said.
This week, a state House committee discussed a series of proposed bills to find a solution to fund public pensions. When questioned by reporters in Harrisburg on Wednesday, Corbett said the pension system needs to be fixed.
During our initial consult, the vision for the various spaces was shared with me. The client's plan was well thought out in terms of the function, but required cohesion and a plan in terms of decor. An already established color palette was a starting point, but beyond that we needed inspiration for the interconnected spaces. With hardwood floors throughout (except for the tile in the sunroom), the obvious place to begin was with floor coverings.
Happy Monday
So I have a couple of bits of Twiddleybitz show and tell.....they have some fabulous new release stuff out and is such GREAT quality chipboard to work with!!!
And for all of you out there who love steam punk like I do stay tuned because Pat has an embroidery machine and has the most awesome pattern of steam punk gears! I am hunting for a tee-shirt right now so I can have her make me a steam punk shirt and when I do I will post a pic for you! Check out Pat's website here and keep her in mind for custom embroidery!
1 Tbs. Soy Sauce
Now, the time has come to take a stand by exhibiting the traits – honor, courage and vigilance.
First consider all the benefits of gaining bigger clients:
3.) Will Ordy and I be awkward? Stiff? Weird?
Ziplock has put out new bags that have a hand vacuum to suck out the extra air. I purchased one but haven’t tested it yet. I will be sure to let you know what I think!
frenzied, at its broken spine, the mindless taxi never slowing, never noticing or caring,
- 1 cup Gluten-free Flour
Some personal injuries lawsuits are resolved in long period of time. So many people do not have enough finances to win their lawsuit cases for long time plus they find it difficult to manage their other expenses along with the lawsuit case expenses. …. More >>
Welcome to my meme, Monday Memories, where I feature favorite books we've loved from the past. You can link to an old review, or write something new about a beloved book from your past. Really, what's important is not the book, but why it is memorable to you. So, have fun reminiscing, and leave a comment below, so we can all enjoy your memories.
The largest study of its kind found people with higher levels of vitamin D in their blood were less likely to develop type 2 diabetes than those with lower levels. It could lead to at-risk patients using vitamin D supplements along with diet and exercise to stop their development of the potentially deadly condition.
Sing praises with understanding.
He in the upper bunk and she in the lower. At 1:00 AM, the man leaned down and gently woke the woman saying, "Ma'am, I'm sorry to bother you, but would you be willing to reach into the closet to get me a second blanket? I'm awfully cold."
When you see God at work, you don't look to blame someone; you look to credit him. Now, I don't know about you, but I have always thought that being blind would be one of the worst handicaps imaginable. To see how God is blessing so many with handicaps so that their handicaps become blessings to them and to others, it increases my faith so much.
The Iranian regime is not interested in nuclear warfare, they are interested in maintaining power. The U.S. is currently committing an act of war by imposing harsh sanctions on Iran. This tactic is very familiar. Their strategy is to impose collective punishment on the Iranian people, so as to force them to overthrow the regime. This is the same tactic that was used in Gaza upon the democratic election of Hamas. Israel imposed a harsh blockade in order to make life so unbearable that citizens would have no other alternative but to overthrow the regime.
By this morning I'd just about got the image out of my head and then the Guardian go and put a photo of them on page 3.
There’s nothing better than a busy weekend, chicks.
The extended family gets even more bizarre, family psychiatrist Dr. Julia Hoffman played by Helena Bonham Carter, the house servant; Willie Loomis played by Jackie Earle Haley, and the Governess of the family who is the apple of Barnabas’ eye; Victoria Winters; played by Bella Heathcote.
Want details? The report stated workers with master’s and bachelor’s degrees earned on average $1,262 and $1,053, respectively, each week. That’s compared to $768 weekly for workers with associate degrees.
How did you decide to write a book of poetry about women sentenced to death for murder? What started the project?
It’s been a week that I was keeping to myself the sad feelings of losing a best friend after reading the most annoying SMS message from him. An exchange of messages thru FB last Thursday and Friday, which I arranged hoping that the schism would be ironed out, proved more fatal. I was ready to lose him from my house and in my life.
Started my first year as the mother of a middle schooler. Oh, boy. It is simpler and more complicated. He seems challenged enough. We are. I feel a little more lost. But he still gives me hugs and doesn't mind holding my hand in public still, so I feel blessed.
Thanks for visiting me today. I hope you've enjoyed my fun little treat bag today, it sure was fun to make! Please come again really soon, but until then...have a lovely day! HUGS! :)
“Photographs of the moon landing show converging shadows were they should be parallel. This could only happen in a studio so the photos must be fake.”
(Carolrhoda Books, an imprint of Lerner)
It's a FREEBIE!!!
8. Video Art from China, Morona Kiang: I did not see all of this show, and to see all of it would have been a daunting, ten hour task. However, the works I saw, especially Ai Weiwei’s Chang’an Boulevard, 2004 and Chin Chuih-Jen’s The Factory, 2003, convinced me of the possible depth of Chinese video art. This is was a show that asked you to study, to explore, and find art you’ve never seen before.
I am honored to be apart of the 1st Annual sMiles 4 Sammy spring football game, silent auction, family fun run and 5k to build an all abilities baseball field in Austin for special needs children, in honor of this precious little girl and her sweet family!
The University of North Carolina - School of the Arts students (my son in white) performed "The Black Parade" last night on campus. It is a dark show, about a young man who dies of cancer and this is his journey to death.... his death evokes his strongest memory which comes in the form of a parade or marching band... The young man "The Patient" replays his memories of his life... (or something like that)
I know what it’s like to read something and think that I believe it. I usually think, Fuck that was obvious. I can’t believe someone just took the time to write that. But there’s a huge difference between actually thinking that I believe something versus believing something deep into my gut.
Chop the onions or shallots, serrano pepper and cilantro. Add this with the turmeric powder to the eggs and whisk.
There is debate though as to whether Perry’s movies are truly spreading Christianity correctly. The central character Madea doesn’t truly represent a Christian way of living with her constant court appearance for her actions, harsh language (void of swearing), viewpoints on how to handle situations and apparent dislike for church even though she thinks others should attend. Madea though is the central character that holds the extended family together in times of crisis. It is the supporting cast that brings the need for Christ into the stories of despair in Perry’s movies. Perry is not afraid to mix the realities of our current culture, family dynamics and God into his movies and this is where I think many Christians find offense.
After studying the draught beer menu:
So when the paediatric allergy nurse at St Mary’s Hospital, where Sidney is seen, said they had secured funding to run a series of support groups and would I be interested in helping to host one I said ‘yes’ right away.
This picture does not do it justice! I made stew last night, making up my own recipe as I went along and it was the best stew that I've ever made. It all began with a Sunday roast which I slow cooked in my crockpot after adding a can of Mushroon soup and some pepper - that was it! After Sunday dinner much of the roast was left over so I stored it in the fridge. Last evening, I got it out and cut it into cubes, then I made the following recipe...
So obviously there is too much to show you everything, I'll pick out the highlights. There was actually some vintage - yay!
So 2008′s Maximum Strength comes out and it’s pretty slammin. Kris sounds sharp, he’s chosen some decent beats. OK, cool. This is probably the weakest of this recent run, but it seemed to signal a shift in the right direction.
Happy April!! I have a few fun (I think!) announcements:
Cher: I don’t know how early someone should have the rip and snip. You know,I’ve had a lot done but at least I don’t look as bad as Mr. Belvedere.”
Start afresh, start anew.
“Due to the current licensing system, we can only release 8-12 titles a month. That’s because we have to pay a minimum guarantee up front for every title we license, which can be several thousand dollars per title. As you can see, this means that cash flow is a really big problem, because (the Japanese publishers/licensors) ask for this money up front before we even publish the books. On top of that, we have to pay the translator, the editor, and the letterer after they complete their work, so all this money is tied up before we can even sell a single book. This is a system that I want to break.“
What’s your must-have road trip item?
Bless the squire and his relations,
That´s why the sales execs should concentrate all their efforts on clear and well understood messages. In other worlds always enhance and present in positive words and build up your staff and point them to the contracts that needs to be signed. Getting the deal is the only goal that the salesperson should be concerned about.
Thank you for your interest in joining the Catholic Mothers Online Blog Roll!
Recognizing a Rodent Infestation
there are two hundred thread count sheets.
Short on wall space? You could even mount a few strips on the back of a door. So much nicer than those over the door shoe racks don't you think?
-Started batting at toys and grasping toys that you find on your own without us placing them in your hands.
There are half-a dozen books in this Creepy Creatures series - Centipedes, Scorpions, Mantises, Spiders, Worms that we've learnt about so far.
“FEMAIL spoke to four, including Juliet Shaw, 31, a PR consultant, who moved from Manchester to Walney Island, Cumbria, in August 2000. She split from her partner four years ago and has two children, Amelia, four, and Bethany, ten.”
The next day I had to leave at the crack of dawn to get to Lincoln in good time to unload all the stuff, set up the Stonewylde stall and get changed into my appropriate garb. I'm not a morning person. Normally Mr B would have organised me and bundled me into the car still mostly asleep, giving me time to wake up slowly during the journey, stopped for coffee somewhere to further the revival process, and then dealt with everything on arrival so all I had to do was find a loo and put on a bit more lipstick.
There were lots of people.
Creepy title screen? Check!
The coronation procession makes its way through the streets of Rome to the Basilica as people cheer and kneel and pray and kiss the ground the pope’s walked on. Inside the Basilica, Alexander is crowned with the papal triple tiara, an awed and humbled look on his face. Oddly, Cesare watches the coronation from the audience, with his family, dressed in what appears to be civilian garb. He’s a bishop, shouldn’t he be participating in some way, or at least sitting with the other princes of the church? Seems strange. As Alexander’s new titles are announced, Lucrezia asks if, now their father’s the holy father, she’ll be called the holy daughter. Cesare says she’ll only change her name when she marries, and she’ll never marry, if he has anything to say about it. Ok, that’s a slightly creepy thing to say to one’s sister, but let’s just get something out of the way here. I don’t know if the show’s going to go in this direction, but all the historical rumors of Lucrezia sleeping with her brother were just that—rumors spread by the family’s many, many enemies who put the story around pretty much because it was the worst thing they could come up with. The vast majority of modern-day historians discredit the story, and even people at that time mostly thought it was nonsense, so I really, really hope the show doesn’t go there, because it’s so cheap and tawdry and unnecessary and mucks up the image of a woman who was, actually, a really interesting, intelligent, worthwhile individual. She and Cesare did have an extremely close, mutually worshipful relationship, but it was most likely nothing more than that.
The kids are doing OK... getting antsy due to the fact that they only have 3 more weeks of school left.
The hardest part of our trip was getting through the airports. Tampa International gets a big thumbs up from me for being very family friendly! They put us through a seperate security line for families. Then, Southwest Airlines let us all preboard with Goldie. (in Pittsburgh only my husband was allowed to board with her, leaving me to struggle with the baby and stroller myself)
If you're happy with the preview, then click 'Done' to continue with any other changes you wish to make, or go to the top right and select 'Apply to Blog' to finish!
Sarah Fishburn is yet another artist that I first "met" through True Colors. She is one of the originals. I have continued to be a fan of her work since that time, enjoying her blog, her books and her sensational zine that she publishes along with Angela Cartwright: Pasticcio Quartz. Sarah infuses her artwork and her life with an abundance of color. She is amazing at creating layer upon layer in her work, a process that is near and dear to my heart.
We will have to decide between two undesirable choices. She will either have to be catheterized every four hours, or we will have to have a surgery that gives her a vesicostomy. Not sure if that's the right word...but where they do a procedure that through a tube she will involuntarily release urine into a diaper (or a bag.) She then loses the ability to feel the urge to go, therefore will always have it and not urinate on her own.
One morning I wanted to make a coffee cake for breakfast but I couldn’t find a recipe that didn’t call for yeast or other ingredients I didn’t have on hand. I wanted almost instant gratification, not time spent waiting for dough to rise. I found some recipes for baking powder coffee cakes in the cookbooks I have so I combined a few. Then I cut down the amounts so I could make a smaller cake.
Me so blessed...
Add more stuffing if needed. Sl st into first st, finish off, leaving long tail for sewing.
4) We are most safe when we are most vulnerable
Then a little stop at the Yarn shop to say hello, Merry Christmas catch up about the last day things and off back home to finish with the cooking and cleaning...
Xerox Phaser 750 Printer – The Dependable Office Printing Solution
Please check for the customer reviews and ratings of Zeiss 8 x 32 T* FL Victory, Water Proof Roof Prism Binocular with 8.0 Degree Angle of View, U.S.A. from the merchant’s site by click on the link below.
I am including it on here because IT IS AWESOME. My confidence comes from the Word of God, I know it’s authority and am excited about what this passage highlights in our lives.
Honestly right now, Seohyun is the only person that i really dont want to meet. When i got there, i see Seohyun is sitting on the bench. I walk to her lazily, as im trying to act normal to her.
My friends quickly reminded me as sneaky as she was about grabbing the shirt, there was no way in hell her parents were going to catch her wearing it.
5. Balancing Act
The “whiner” is much like the nagger, but less obvious. The persona mumbles and complains under their breath. Nothing is ever good enough for a whiner, but they do not beat you over the head like a nagger. It’s more subtle, but can be just as intolerable.
You would think this evidence would convince us -- we who are supposed to be media savvy -- that the web is not everything it's cracked up to be as a persuasive advertising medium. But we have deluded ourselves that because the web has great cultural impact it must also have great advertising impact. Even though the evidence is less than compelling.
Judith 16:13-16
WARNING! THE FOLLOWING INFORMATION MAY BE CHRONOLOGICALLY INACCURATE, BECAUSE I HAVE A TERRIBLE MEMORY!
She was recently voted #14 on Time magazine's list of "140 Best Twitter Feeds" -- placing hers among the feeds that are shaping the conversation, the magazine hailed her "must-read" live Bachelor tweets, noting that "rarely has there been such an ideal pairing of material and writer." She can also be found on Facebook, and, in real life, Philadelphia, where she lives with her family.
Because let’s face it, it’s easy to fall into a rut and live everyday if only to make it to the next, but to say that the people who are doing just that are children who just don’t get what’s going on outside of their own bubble (which to an extent, yes, is true, but not entirely) and who look for someone to show them what’s going on like children do as students is to also not fully understand the situation of these people. Meaning that Siddhartha was just as child-like as the people he called child-people. Oh the irony?
“I let them know there at the courthouse that it was extremely frustrating,” Ralph said. “I lost my whole morning.”
However I wanted to share “This Week With Alan Caruba”. Alan’s work stands the test of time well and is always profound. This week he has outdone himself, if for no other reason than the number of different issues, but the depth of these postings. Please enjoy Alan’s week of news and opinion.
porteur de joie
10/21 Omaha, NE @ Sokol Underground
(And I thought I was the only one.)
Then again...so is my health, right?
- cut the front in half to make two panels
1 package bacon, sliced
A more personal approach
Happy halfway point of NaNoWriMo for those of you doing it! How are you holding up? How are the areas of your life that you're neglecting to write holding up? :)
1/2 tsp. ground cloves
Oh and to see the lovely blogging set - they make me smile muchly - who have a few more words to say too!
Each time we travel to adopt we reconnect during these trips and fall in love all over again.
Músicas:
This was the only pattern that students did not see as a pattern. It was described as just random fitting together, and someone asked about the yellow. "They were supposed to be orange." And then the author shared how they were lines of blocks fit together. Another student shared how to her it was a skewed checkerboard. Then the class unanimously agreed it was a pattern. I thought that was really interesting and asked how they would verbalize it. Good descriptions followed. Could they capture it symbolically? No, not that I expected it. So I shared a bit about the wallpaper groups, and how mathematicians seek the power of good notation so they can symbolically manipulate. I also shared how I had thought the yellow was a pattern in a pattern.
"In the Garden of Eden" by I. Ron Butterfly.
Boundary Bay Brewery Bellingham, WA Galena Single Hop Pale Ale Pale Ale
LGE should learn to do this more often
Nov 06 Sheffield Octagon Sheffield, UK
The final decision that the two main parties should share control of the ministry of home affairs, and that the rest of the power-sharing deal should stand as agreed by Mbeki, is neither rational nor workable.
CURTIS HANSON (L.A. Confidential)
1) Heat oil and fry chilli paste until aromatic and oil separates
SF) You as an artist in three adjectives? / Tu come artista, in tre aggettivi?
After Clara departs, Muffy finds something from her disturbing childhood: a Jack-in-the-box toy. In a flashback, Muffy remembers the toy as a birthday gift. A sibling played a prank on her, by replacing Jack's head with a weird lizard-monster action figure head.
Nigella Lawson includes a recipe for marmite sandwiches in her book, ‘How to Eat’. Her description of mixing marmite with butter before spreading it on white bread was enough to have me uttering moans of nostalgic greed, as good quality white bread and marmite is enough to reduce me to a Mastermind moment for those of you who are my British vintage, in that like Magnus Magnusson, I feel a “I’ve started, so I’ll finish’ compulsion coming over me and the loaf of bread vanishes quick smart.
This is good news: evidently, once the "repairs" are finished, the bakery will re-open, being open on Sundays until Christmas, of which there's only one left. I was concerned for the neighbors: I only patronize the bread end of things, but the bakery's main source of income seems to be fancy stuff, and they have a loose-leaf book of seasonal things you can order -- and people do. There are a lot of traditional sweets at this time of year, just like everywhere, and Ortholan makes several levels of bûche de Noël, and king cakes of every diameter, among other things. People pre-pay for these, and having your bakery plotz right before Christmas is a nightmare.
2004: No foal (bred to Storm Cat)
-- @ronniewk
Kinda hurtful!
It is a vulnerable ‘exposing the belly’ kind of thing, and cannot be achieved through ‘control’. Because it’s nothing to do with your mind, and everything to do with your soul!
The smile that made my cheeks look massive. I’ll have to think of a way to disguise them. How I don’t know. Any ideas anyone?
Perhaps this is a good starting point?
Obama favors control over governing? In the most important big policy changer so far, health care reform, rather than dictate to Congress, Obama asked Congress to assemble a proposal. Republicans refused to participate in making a good bill until Nancy Pelosi got it passed in the House. Then, rather than wake up and try to make changes they might need in the Senate, they launched a campaign of slander and fiction against health care.
What is a less likely combination? Events/distances with disparate training make it unlikely that you will set PRs. It is unlikely that you will set mile and marathon PRs on the same training program. It is doubtful that you will train for an Ironman and set Sprint triathlon PRs together. If you do PRs in these disparate events it’s most likely because you never run one distance or the other enough to have been your best at it.
“Damon,” I said.
I took delivery of a customer’s new I3 last week and got around to rigging up some hangpoints when a friend came round yesterday to look at it (with the purchaser’s permission of course!), and I must say it’s a lovely piece of kit. Of course the first thing you notice is the weight, or lack of it. Compared to my Impress 2+ it’s a featherweight! I realise that my I2 has a reserve in it, but even so it’s so much less bulky because of the lack of a seatplate and the foam nose cone.
So tell me. What do you think?
Revolvr
exciting and exotic places—all with reasonably priced airfares.
Like The Voice the panel of mentors – comprising Tony Christie, Pixie Lott, Keith Duffy, and – surprisingly – journalist, writer and broadcaster Jon Ronson (believed to have been booked followinng confusion about the availability of Mark Ronson) – sat in giant swivel chairs with their backs to the contestants , meaning they were unable to judge the contestants based on their looks. However, each contestant required to perform while suffering from laryngitis. For some the laryngitis left them with rasping croaks reminiscent of the mating cries of the Natterjack Toad; for others the laryngitis left the contestant virtually silent and requiring to perform their blind auditions using the medium of interpretative dance or mime, while being cheered by a deluded whooping audience. Each mentor then had to select the members of his or her team by taking a chance that following recovery the contestant had some semblance of talent.
After putting up with wannabe Safran’s like Lawrence Leung and the Hungry Beast moppets it’s good to see the real thing back on the ABC where he belongs. John’s often labelled a ‘troublemaker’ and once again he goes above and beyond to prove himself as one. In this first episode John tackles the idea of ‘sticking with your tribe’, and ponders whether people find members of a different race are attractive just because they’re from a different race?
It takes bribery.
Cola float weightless migration
“Oh, down by the poultry cooler”
To which Killer Opening Songs will reply... will reply... will reply...
. . . we all live downstream of possible pollution.
You can certainly forgive a friend or stranger who acted in the heat-of the moment. For the government to forgive a serial killer, a terrorist or a general dwyer, is to put thousands of innocent people at risk! We can then abolish the judiciary and just have a board that says “turn-the-other-cheek”!
If the protesters are asking the government for ANYthing, then it is not at all a hand-out in the sense that our tax dollars pay for it. Big banks and other industry got a huge hand-out in the form of the bail-out dollars and that's ok?? So a hand-out for giant mechanisms that don't use sustainable business practices is ok but individuals needing anything can go screw themselves? There is so much wrong with that I don't know where to start.
Palpatine: apoplectic What the? How did you get in here? Who let you in?
…I would like to say a few words in respect of the various other participants, besides ourselves, in the Munich Agreement. After everything that has been said about the German Chancellor today and in the past, I do feel that the House ought to recognise the difficulty for a man in that position to take back such emphatic declarations as he had already made amidst the enthusiastic cheers of his supporters, and to recognise that in consenting, even though it were only at the last moment, to discuss with the representatives of other Powers those things which he had declared he had already decided once for all, was a real and a substantial contribution on his part. With regard to Signor Mussolini, . . . I think that Europe and the world have reason to be grateful to the head of the Italian government for his work in contributing to a peaceful solution.
They showed replays of what took place last week, but the one thing I didn’t like was I heard Fortune had new music, but they didn’t showcase it. Flair said that “Big Bad Doug” Williams is now a part of Fortune, as is Matt Morgan, who Flair referred as “The Insurance Policy” who will protect Ric. Good call.
Mom always loved to tell stories about my sister and I and the organ. Apparently when I was really little, she had to bring me with her to a funeral. I kept changing the stops and messed up the songs. (Ooh! Button! I wanna push the button!) My sister was once sitting next to her on the organ bench during a church service. Suddenly there was this humming sound, and no one knew what it was. My sister had fallen face-first onto the keyboard.
Now let's talk about the packaging. The light-up wand is a great touch that you can use when lighting is bad so you always get the perfect application. Not to mention I've used the light to find things inside my purse. The mirror on the side of the tube is a great feature too. This is what I call a purse gloss - meaning you should always keep one in your purse because not only will the color be there for you whenever you want, but the light and the mirror will come in handy for more than just your gloss application.
1) i love LA: one of my new years goals from last year was to be more social offline so i've really made an effort to be more active in the design scene centered here in los angeles. this has paid off in the number of absolutely lovely people i've met and befriended in the last year. a few years ago, i dreaded attending parties associated with the los angeles design community because i didn't know a soul; now i'm inconsolable if i have to miss an event, because i'll miss an opportunity to see the warm, talented, funny, and supportive individuals i've come to know and love! too many names to name here (y'all know who you are), but each of you make the formerly dreaded work-mixer a now much anticipated event!
They refused to accept any blame. They have returned the money to the real Barry, but I'm out of pocket to the tune of £800 plus my Ebay listing and selling fees.
Everything that Your plan is about,
Manchester United face North West rivals Wigan on Wednesday, knowing that they lead the race for the Premier League title by eight points.
These are the kind of days that make kids skip one day to take a breather, and return the next striving for life-goals year after year. These are the kind of days that flood my text inbox with “Today was a good day.” They are the kind of days that bind. They make us more than family. They allow us to know each other. They are the kind of days that offer us moments of love, the kind of days that allow us time to understand.
But this is for you, too. Are you adopting? Do you need a fundraiser?
You know, Pavlov’s dog? Ring a bell and it drools? The form of conditioning that was “discovered” first and the principles of which must be thoroughly understood before operant conditioning (reward/punishment learning) can even be attempted?
Coming closer,
I am one who reminds you how wonderful it is to be alive.
I know that being a receptionist isn't glamourus, but it's important and it allows us all to be more efficient and better serve our clients and our community. I hope you'll join me in thanking Barb for her time, effort, and compassion. Thank you Barb!!
One and all
1. Would you say you are primarily a stamper or a scrap booker?
For more than a hundred years, Republicans have aggressively supported arming blacks, so they could defend themselves against Democrats.
Spell check is arguing with me about "Chupacabra." It gives me only the option to ignore. No such luck, Spell check. Wishful thinking will get you nowhere.
Then I hot glued the bottom of the tree to the Tea light holders, then filled with layers of gravel using more hot glue and pressing each layer of stones well into the glue, this then holds the tree upright
I am not trying to be to synincal but these folks arent doing anything that my grandparents haven't already done when I was coming up. I grew up not throwing things away, buying in bulk, having a backyard garden, shopping the local meat market instead of major chain, passing down clothes and shopping thrift. It wasn't called Green or Zero Waste back then it was called Survival in a large middle/ low income family. lol!
In a basin of hot soapy water, gently rub the mat till it felts up. Rinse. Give it a quick spin. Then dry the mat, keeping it flat. I gave it a day to dry.
Dilip Kumar was not merely an actor or a star. His performance defined our personal world view of love and longing, life and death, not just our hair style. Dilip Kumar made unrequited love and sacrifice fashionable for an entire generation. Heart broken healthy young men prayed to get TB. Many hit the bottle. Tousled hair and brooding eyes became fashion statements.
Jennifer Fabric. It's all about the fabric. I open my fabric cupboard and want to start 15 new projects. Immediately. But I guess I have to say that I am also inspired by individual people, since I often make quilts specifically for someone, as a gift. I like the challenge of seeing through someone else's eyes, trying to anticipate what would appeal to him or her.
I honestly remember thinking how we would all be sad forever. Even Cayden, he wanted a sibling so bad, just to have his die..it was hard to see him so upset..I feel such relief for all of us, but especially for him.. they are such a great pair.. I love them both so much... I can't imagine my life without these 2 crazy kiddos..
I will miss this community’s easy camaraderie, for all the “independent” journalist party line. Independence gets lonely.
A second single from Finch's self-released era followed in December 1976 (Short Changed Again / One Nighter, Eagle ES 1002). Regular readers will know that we're as partial to the odd piece of long-haired misogyny as the next bogan, provided selves are not taken too seriously and sick riffage abounds. Alas, Short Changed Again falls at the first hurdle. Don't these dorks know that they'll keep getting cock-blocked until they learn to stop tripping over their own knuckles? As for the riffing, the song presages Finch's descent into mersh hard rock - decent enough, but proceedings would benefit greatly from knuckles and musical balls occupying adjacent real estate. Compared with Roses, you will certainly feel like you got less than you bargained for. A live version of the song, featured alongside AC/DC and Radio Birdman on 2JJ's Long Live The Evolution LP (AA9042, 1977), is included here for educational purposes only.
I tried to reach behind the cabinet, but there wasn't enough room. Laverne crouched at the other end, just waiting, tail swishing.
“What exactly transpired – we’re still trying to gather information,” said officer John Chambers, another police spokesman.
Admiral Jerome L. Johnson, USN (Ret.)
Grace abundant I am giving you.
The good news is that The Penelopiad definitely passed the test of time for me. It's a short book but from the first sentence ("Now that I'm dead I know everything"), I was engrossed and I breezed through the whole book in under a day, just what I needed after reading stuffy non-fiction all week. At the simplest level, The Penelopiad is a well told, engrossing story with an interesting cast of characters.
Mousie's class had their own Christmas party where they each nominated which food they would bring. Mousie took along reindeer cupcakes, an idea brought into our house by Possum from her Year 8 Food Tech class.
I can’t wait to go back to Galway in early August…
“You brush up for the bottom teeth and down for the top teeth,” said Angela Davis, hygienist and former vice-presidential candidate for the American Communist Party. “Like this. And make sure you do it every night before you go to bed.”
So here we present the first. Poliakov's Pyramid Of Engagement. A simple, yet convincing-looking chart to prove what our common-sense tells us. That people are more likely to spend time engaging with something that they're very interested in. Ergo, if you are marketing a product that isn't in the top interest zone, you better have a rip-snorting, son-of-a-bitch of an idea (or a big prize) if you want anyone to interact any further than a cursory glance. So now you can turn up at that meeting to discuss the lame user-generated-content campaign idea for the new scouring-pad client, armed with suitably complicated-looking ammunition to back-up your argument that everyone is taking crazy-pills if they think anyone is going to take-part.
And in the role of the flamboyant powerhouse, James St. James, we have Seth Green. A stretch? Hardly. Once again…perfection.
It’s 5:30am, watching the sun break over the trees with that soft, golden light you only see in the mornings with the stillness that belies the incoming storm.
The images are from a 19th century book of lithographs. The book was too damaged to keep as a whole, and I bought it with wall art in mind – the book may be damaged, but the images were hiding there ready to see the light of day.
And so continues the second tale of treachery and adventure, sword fighting and magic, myth and legend.
I prayed a prayer of guidance. I prayed a prayer of wisdom. I prayed a prayer to have the Holy Spirit guide me as I worked on a speaking engagement to have my thoughts, ideas, and training points led by God to make an impact on the audience who would be receiving the message. And as I wrote, as my hand graced the paper in front of me, as the ink quickly filled the spaced lines, I found myself reveling in what looked like nothing to anyone who could see me.
Warning: People with low groan tolerance, people who faint at the sight of puns, and those operating heavy machinery should seek medical advice before reading this post.
Mia: I really enjoyed her character, she is the ever reluctant hero of the story. She just wants to be left alone and not bothered about her weird freakish dangerous addiction. I was completely intrigued by her ability to survive and crave so many lightening strikes. Love her ever stubborn attitude and completely loyalty and protectiveness to her family.
1964 FELICIA (also writer)
Third, we give a warm Dollhouse welcome to KAREN WRAY, who will be joining in the November Challenges as our next Guest Dollie! If you haven't been to Karen's blog, DO check it out HERE - the girl's got MAD SKILLZ, and we're thrilled and totally honored to have her! You'll get to see her stuff very soon, so get ready to have your socks knocked off! :D
Everyone knows cats are cute and affectionate. Well, maybe the people who don’t have cats think that. Pia and Fluff are my two cats; Pia is lazy and can’t catch a bird if it waited for him. Pia spends his day lounging on Mom’s bed, then with much effort, gets up to get to his food-bowl, it takes more effort to get up the stairs and curl up again. We adopted Pia thinking he would be playful like a little kitten (which at the time he was a half-grown kitten). But we were wrong, he is the opposite.
Now it's time to see yours!
It was midnight. It was dark outside. And once I got off campus, across Windsor, it became pitch black.
If I'm to rival Monty Don
I was also published in the Mercanile Gathering again. I hope people love it and make it.
This was worrying, because links to the page appeared on posts on the family’s (and other) FB pages, which also gave details of my daughter’s gigs. Effectively they said, ‘This is where we live, and this is when we’ll be out”. In the case of a burglary, it would have been enough to invalidate our contents insurance. As she is a young, female performer, we have also made efforts to ensure that information useful to stalkers was not readily in the public domain.
That was back in December 2010. And my exploration turned out in quite a few little „adventures“ I’d like to show you soon enough.
In Stone's opinion, Alex Jones is honest, but kept in the dark by handlers.
Friendly Fara Froggy oggles her reflection,
YEAH! I'm too drunk to fuck ya!
I also made another card this week. It uses a gorgeous digi from A Day for Daisies and some little scraps of paper and ribbon that I had in my scrap pile. I colored the image with Copic markers and Prismacolor pencils:
So yesterday I biked for 5 miles then ran 1 mile outside. Today I biked for 5.5 miles and ran 1 mile. I have to say I am also surprised at the different muscles you use biking verses running. My legs are screaming for a day off. Tomorrow will be my off day. I will do try to get the shred in after work but no biking or running tomorrow.
I was looking for songs that reflected the positive sense of self that I felt I’d gained from the women’s movement. I couldn’t find any. All I could find were these awful songs like “I am woman and you are man, I am weak so you can be stronger than.” So I realized the song I was looking for didn’t exist and I was going to have to write it for myself.
So how did the Superstars Writing Seminar change me? I'm no longer going to sit around and wait for someone to tell me I'm good enough to do this. If I really want it, I can go out and get it.
The August menu has several new features. One of them is the new freezer meal option. Each weekly menu will now have at least one meal marked "freezable". Since you will already be making your 5 dinners in 1 hour, it will be super easy to just double (or triple) the "freezable" recipes during your cooking hour.
We were asked not to talk about the show too much so I won't.
The thing is, Michelle Obama would never say, “Let them eat cake” and is frankly offended that cake is being wasted on the proletariat who clearly don’t deserve cake until November when it’s time to vote again.
£80). Once we have confirmed numbers we would look at buying entrance tickets to
1 1/2 cups cookie crumbs; made from plain biscotti; gingersnaps, graham crackers, or a combination of gingersnaps and graham crackers
Airan Kang @ Bruce Wolkowitz Gallery
I would never have made a real historian. It was, with English, my favourite subject at school and like English I dropped it firmly after ‘A’ level. My history teacher understood. He knew that while I could churn out an essay with relative ease, my heart wasn’t in it. My first reaction to any piece of information is not ‘why’ or ‘how’ or, most usefully, ‘when’, but ‘what if?’ And maybe that’s what marks out a novelist from a historian and a historical fantasy writer from a historical writer.
However, we don’t have the time, money, or kitchen staff to pull of such an epic event. With a limited budget and only two of us cooking, we decided on a traditional family-style Victorian dinner of only four courses instead. I drew up two menus and we chose between them on the basis of time, access to ingredients, and personal taste. Here, for your edification, is the meal we decided NOT to serve. I've included the original Victorian recipe (with few extra notes for the modern cook).
I was picking up my mail today when this little guy came trotting down the street toward me. Stepping carefully around puddles left by the quickly melting snow on this suddenly spring-like February day.
Thanks to modern science, every human being has become a ticking genetic time bomb—males only live to age twenty-five, and females only live to age twenty. In this bleak landscape, young girls are kidnapped and forced into polygamous marriages to keep the population from dying out.
Of course it's all nonsense but I do find myself identifying with these traits. How about you?
Guess who?
So here comes in what we know as “Lawyer speak” and it opens so many loop holes of interpretation that the law looks like a Swiss cheese.
There are other carrots. For example, city streets and other city property underlying the arena would be acquired for $1, while other city streets and properties would be acquired at fair market value. Various state programs could provide energy cost savings for the arena.
+ oil for deepfrying
Rowan made us another present at pre-school that is wrapped up that we’ll open on Christmas. I have a feeling it’s also an ornament! :)
Are you a fan of Beauty & The Beast too? Do you want to join me in Sunway on 18th February in the afternoon around 2pm? Let me know, as the deals will end in 2 days time. If you are keen, you can click on the link, and buy the tickets, and I can meet you there for a show and coffee.
But by night he is a prolific crime novelist and short story writer.
Dr. Lokin +15 +10
Shogun: Total War 2 is a strategy game that blends elements of real-time and turn-based gameplay. In the former mode, large armies gather to bash each other’s heads in, all in glorious DX11. We tested two modes — first, the game’s “Very High” preset, followed by our own custom Ultra High mode, in which we added 8x MSAA and tuned all of the various variables to their maximum settings.
Like the siren's song, I'm always tempted by a beautifully scented, handmade soap or soy candle melt but I show restraint when I know that I'm only buying fruit and vegies today so no money for these little luxuries. Sure, treat yourself from time to time but really, when a cake of soap that resembles a slice of cake costs $7.50 each, is it really worth it? I think I might eat it for that price!
Walter Jennings recounts some of the complications of a relationship that has refused to stay within conventional, and national, boundaries.
Anyways, I watched this one guy who was making all sorts of noise, actually tuning his guitar right in the middle of the room. He was yelling to people coming in and pretty much giving no respect to an amazing female vocalist and guitarist on stage.
So, today, we honor the Agathos Daimon: both as the god who guided Alexander the Great and allowed him to found the great city of Alexandria; and also as that part of each of us–no matter our gender–that is our connection to divinity, and that is the seed-plant of our own potential heroization or deification (at best) or the enduring part of ourselves that survives death and is joined to our ancestors (at worst). And, we honor Antinous as the image of that god and that class of being: as the guiding, swirling serpent that leads us to new foundations and renewal, and that guides us as well to fostering our own inner divinity, not by leading us inward to an internal sanctum of solipsism, disinterest, detached indifference, and independence from the world, but by leading us outward to find solace and space in a world that may seem harsh, foreign, and even dangerous, and yet which is our ultimate, and only, home in the universe.
"It turned into animal farm - it was even worse than watching men fight," she said. "It was mean girl bullying in that room - that's not why I'm here as a woman or here in politics."
But feral cities are one thing, cities under siege are something else.
Last Monday's YouGov poll in the Evening Standard had Boris ahead just 51-49 and a lead on first preferences cut from five points (45-40) to just two (43-41). it's probably fair to say that were there almost any other Tory facing almost any other Labour candidate, the Labour candidate would be miles ahead but this is London and we are dealing with Boris and Ken.
“Each of the two stars I am giving Whiteout are for the lovely, courageous Beckinsale because she acted her frozen ass off in Whiteout. But the rest of her Antarctica crew let her down. And by let her down, I mean, sent her off on an ice floe to die…”
In one mob-attack by black township dwellers against a Free State police staton, the local ANC-MEC in charge of security ordered the cops to ‘use maximum force’; attacks against Afrikaners included the murder of Bloemhof farmer At van der Merwe on Apr 3; Heilbron farmer Christo van Rensburg who survived a molotov-cocktail attack on Apr 10; five Afrikaner families were kidnapped from their homes in one small suburb: Uitsig, Bloemfontein; Harrismith farmer Tjokkie Venter was stabbed in the face by illegal squatters on a government-owned farm; workers Chris Grobler and Eugene Lloyd survive an attack on a Kroonstad farm; and an ANC-official of the Sasolburg town council ran his car at breakneck speed at the popular Afrikaans singer Zak van Niekerk, killing him and critically injuring his friend;
The District Attorney from El Paso, Jaime Esparza, said El Paso and surrounding counties have been doing DL and insurance checkpoints for years. He says DPS has even assisted local agencies in his jurisdiction at DL/insurance checkpoints, including near the bridges, but they were temporary, targeted, locally controlled, and not aimed at seizing money or guns.
Merrill Lynch Survey of Hedge Fund Managers
Anyway, wish me luck! I have a list of posts that I need to catch up on.
(1) There is an innate tension between democracy and bureaucracy that obliges career public servants to protect democratic principles;
14 different branches and frosty botanicals
Many best wishes,
On March 16, 2010, I attended a meeting of Physics Northwest (PNW) where I presented one of the demonstrations I use to illustrate electromagnetic induction & magnetic braking. You take a large slab of high-conductivity, oxygen-free copper (mine is 10 inches in diameter & 1 inch thick) and place a very strong neodymium magnet atop it (my magnet is one from www.wondermagnet.com). As the magnet moves in the vicinity of the copper conductor, there is a changing magnetic flux through the copper which – in accordance with Faraday’s Law – will induce eddy currents within the copper disk. These eddy currents then interact with the magnetic field of the magnet, producing – through the right(left)-hand-rule – a force which opposes the original motion of the magnet.
Too bad he's set on living
More to answer my mom's question than anything else, I thought I'd just spend some time letting you know how I'm doing.
Now, we no longer have to do that. The doctors we have are advocates of us, as parents, and view us as important to the process as they are. The doctors we have now are open to our suggestions and offer us an array of new and thoughtful ideas to address Bennett's issues.
And finally it's time to announce the guest designer as chosen by Lisa who we would love to have join us for Challenge #4, remember we will be choosing a GD with every new challenge so if you weren't successful this time there will be plenty more opportunities. So we would love to invite as our GD for Challenge #4....
When did “safety first” creep into the top spot on the priority list of our national parenting consciousness? If you’re a parent now, chances are your parents left you in the car while they ran into the post office, and you babysat three or four neighbor kids by the time you were twelve. Most moms today wouldn’t think of leaving infants or toddlers with seventh graders, even though THEY were seventh graders 20 years ago who managed not to maim the little ones in their care. Is it because we didn’t “know” how dangerous all those activities were, we didn’t think twice about doing them?
They go planet side for Spock’s wedding. Only his bride-to-be T’Pring decides to evoke “kal-if-fee,” which means Spock has to fight to complete the wedding rites against her chosen champion of choice. Everyone but the viewer at home thinks she’s going to pick Stonn, a Vulcan who’s standing around looking impatient, but she throws a wrench into everything by selecting Kirk as her champion. T’Pau (the super important Vulcan leader overseeing the ceremony) asks Kirk if he’ll accept and Kirk says sure, why not, I could go a few rounds.
The French onion soup was as good as advertised. The cheese was browned nicely and the croutons were plentiful with just the right amount of moistness. When Marty came back to fill up my water glass I noticed a little bit of string on his pants. I debated whether to point this out to him and decided to say something. Marty said that's another one of Bruce's efficiency ideas. The string is used to pull down his zipper and allows him to use the restroom without touching anything that would force him to have to wash his hands which takes time. Bruce doesn't like doing unnecessary things and soap costs money. I was dumbfounded, but impressed with the idea, but one thing I couldn't figure out, how do you get it back in, I asked.
After staying out for all for eternity, Thomas Vermaelen played 90 minutes against Man Utd’s reserves and came out unscathed. He said a few days ago that he’s raring to go but he made a point that the final say rests with the boss AW. When we played Man Utd on Sunday, Djourou picked up an injury and he might be a doubt for Sunday’s game so the media Vultures are insinuating that the Belgian defensive leader would make his home coming in the Britannia Stadium when we play those footballing thugs that robbed us of Fabregas and Walcott before the Carling Spoon final. Heaven knows that El Capitan and Walcott would have made a major difference in the tie against Birmingham but there’s no point opening an injury that’s already sealed with a bandage. I’ve done that many times in previous posts.
A few pool noodles strapped together with a bit of duct tape.
My advice is both inside and outside the box. It’s not an ego-driven rant, but a delivery system of information and insight gathered throughout my career, which has spanned almost two decades of unprecedented change in the music industry. It is the kind of book that will be found in practice spaces, in instrument cases, in recording studios, and on the bedside table. This is not a reference book to be read on rare occasions but a guide to be constantly consulted. Every miniscule detail is not addressed, but the broad spectrum of ideas, applications, and methods is laid out in a solid blueprint form.
When I took my citizenship exam in Philadelphia, my lawyer (having a lawyer was itself a benefit of my economic and racial privilege) pointed out that there were two rooms, one where most or all of the people would become citizens and the other across the hall where people would be denied. The room I was in was overwhelmingly white and the room across the hallway was predominantly people of color. There were no signs “whites only” like in South Africa, yet there could have been.
Gloucestershire police chief inspector Rob Priddy said: "We were pleased to support these operations in order to ensure the law is upheld at Stow Horse Fair. We hope the actions taken act as a warning to others engaging in these activities they will not be tolerated."
We then went for a walk along the stone jetty. Morecambe's version of a pier. There were lots of sculptures and artwork featuring birds. Big ones, little ones and some in the ground. We walked to the end, and boy was it windy. But bracing as well, and it was great to hear the sound of seagulls. That always reminds me of the coast, fish and chips and sandcastles.
"Ohhh. Oh well, very good. Very well then. You can just ignore my inane ramblings."
I have grown to love bath time with Benjamin when he’s not being a complete and utter pain. He eagerly wants to help us wash him, as long as it’s not behind his ears. And I know I posted this on facebook, but it bears repeating:
It’s funny how little one really knows or recalls about the stories one grew up hearing. Like most Indian kids, my favourite bedtime stories used to be from the Mahabharata and the Ramayana, which my grandmother would narrate to me every night at bedtime. When I was a little older, I would watch the television adaptations of these stories every Sunday and when I started to read, Amar Chitra Katha’s comic book versions kept me entertained. The thing that struck me the most, even at that young age, was how these stories never got old. They remained constantly fascinating and endlessly repeatable. There was always something fresh, some new connection that one hadn’t quite understood the last time, or a new perspective through which one viewed these ancient stories.
ballistic vest of happiness?
Jake.
The Pens need to add a future star or two to the bottom of the lineup, or at least a few quick skaters with the potential to develop into those types of players.
Today, make sure that the fruit that comes from your life is positive. Make sure that you are making a positive impact on people’s lives, that you are turning people to the Lord and not leaving them hurt and confused. People are looking at you to see what type of fruit you are bearing.
It’s getting late. Lam and I watched Cold Mountain, his first time and my second time. I honestly didn’t remember much of it because I watched it too long ago. I just remembered I was like obsessed with how Ada (Nicole Kidman) was longing for Inman (Jude Law). I didn’t remember that Renée Zellweger and Natalie Portman were also starred in it neither. I couldn’t find my feelings for it back then, but it’s a great movie still.
You’re fine
After how well my monkey finger puppet turned out, I decided to make more. With Easter right around the corner, I thought some seasonal animals would be especially fun. So here's my white Easter Bunny finger puppet:
Card # 1353: Stephen Drew, 2009 Topps Heritage Chrome C57, Arizona Diamondbacks (1353/1960)
6. SLEEP ∞ OVER - your world is night
Give it a watch and let me know if you like it?? Leave a comment
The fabric is Braemore Fioretto in Graphinte.
the audience.
Yes, Margaret has a hard life with a mother who, to modern sensibilities, is thoroughly awful, seemingly totally lacking in compassion, and yet by the end of the book we come to realise that Margaret herself is just as determined and equally callous.
Ladies and gentleman (and those that don't fall in either category) if this happens to you, call 911 immediately!!
I LOVE MICHIGAN - especially this year!!!
About fifteen years ago, I learned that I have hypothyroidism and have been on medication for it since then. The medication reduced the size of the nodule that had grown on my thyroid. This fall at my annual check-up, my doctor (I love my doctor) noticed that the nodule had grown larger again. Could mean thyroid cancer. Hmm. The specialist I was referred to told me that if one could choose the cancer they got, thyroid cancer would be the one to choose because it is so slow growing. Uh, okay.
Under the influence of Baron Haussmann and the engineer town planners, although the word place was retained to designate the spaces formed at the junctions of the many diagonal or radiating roads used by them, the true idea of a place was quite lost in Paris. It was not until Camillo Sitte drew attention to the artistic side of town planning in his book ” Der Stadtebau ” that the true meaning and importance of the place was realised. If we examine German plans made before the spread of his influence, we shall find them carrying on mainly the Haussmann tradition, and shall usually look in vain for the true place.
That's fine by me. Her mysteries are mesmorizing and her sense of period and detail so acute that one is pulled into another world.
Nutrition can be a touchy topic, with everyone having their own very specific viewpoint on what is good for them and their family. As many of you may know, we believe in a fairly primal diet - limiting our grains - emphasis on bone broths from grass fed animals, grass fed meats, wild seafood, good fats (coconut oil, grass fed butter and cream) and lots of organic fruit and vegetables.
“If you love someone put their name in a circle, not a heart, because hearts can be broken but circles go on forever!”
These dark porters, brewed in England but popular with Russian royalty, were high in alcohol, sweet, and dense, and survived the journey from Britain to the Baltic and across Russia. They are still popular in the Baltic states, where they are still brewed. Samuel Smith’s of Yorkshire produces a fine example.
Happy Stampin'!
This is the first 20v driver I’ve come across and the first Dewalt product I’ve owned. I’m happy to say I’ve been blown away by it’s power and performance.The battery charged quickly and has been holding power for much longer than I ever anticipated.There is a very handy light that remains lit for about 30 seconds after you press it. Very helpful in small dark areas.The only two things I’ve missed that my last dr…
Many have been the time-travel tales since then. However, we have envisioned the process differently. One does not
Someone, somewhere, must think this is what happens.
Simpson gave birth to a daughter named Maxwell Drew Johnson in Los Angeles on Tuesday, said publicist Lauren Auslander.
* Maths wise, most of the real learning happens incidentally (counting money, measuring, games, travel etc) but for various reasons we choose to use textbooks a few times a week ... Targeting Maths books, and CD rom 'labs' (which are a lot of fun) and Singapore Maths text and workbooks, easy to work with and useful and tolerable. If I needed a program right now, I'd probably buy Go Maths (comprehensive, challenging, fun, relevant), but I just can't justify it with all that we have, and the eclectic mix we have offers the diversity and freedom we seem to need :)
100% Cotton is my favourite choice and i use it 95% of the time. It is a low loft, it drapes beautifully, soft, cuddly, warm and natural. Cotton batting tends to stick to the backing and top fabrics well so it doesn't shift around as much and easy to make your quilt sandwich. It is available in bleached white, great for your white quilts, natural in colouring or grey for your darker quilts. 95% of the time I use this batting in the natural colour. I love it.
• Sweet Flavorburst Bell Peppers – it’s round 2 for trying Bell Peppers, last year didn’t yield anything so we’re going transplants this year to see if that makes a difference.
By middle school, Rachel was writing and illustrating her stories. She'd spend hours after school, writing and drawing. When she was in 7th grade, she contacted a publisher to inquire about how to get one of her stories published. Imagine my surprise when the publisher returned her call, wanting to talk to us about the book she had written.
The Assignments were prepared by specially selected law firms and companies that specialized in providing “mortgage default services” to banks and mortgage companies. In jurisdictions with a high rate of mortgage defaults, over 80% of the filed Mortgage Assignments in the last three years were prepared and filed by the same five or six law firms and default processing companies.
It was a fun project and I learned so much.
It comes as another two boats carrying suspected asylum seekers were intercepted by Australian authorities on Friday, one northwest of Christmas Island, believed to have 50 passengers, and another, which arrived on Cocos Island with 81 passengers.
EDIT: How could I forget Hidamari Sketch?
century,police rubbed pepper in victims’ eyes or packed chili
We had a thunderstorm and a VERY COLD weather that day. We even had a blackout for about an hour in the middle of reception! Yeah, it was unprepared and pretty hectic at first, but I think it made the whole wedding memorable and quite casual as candles were lit everywhere, making it very romantic. The songs that some of the guests were singing had to be improvised to acapella too and they sounded great! Not to mention that M looked absolutely beautiful, she looked gorgeous! Jefry has got to be one of the luckiest men.
Western Cape Education Department spokesman Paddy Attwell confirmed the case. Statistics provided by the SA Council for Educators to the Department of Basic Education showed that, between 2007 and 2009, 25 cases of sexual assault of pupils by teachers in the Western Cape had been reported.- Cape Times
* Cool on pan 10 minutes, transfer onto rack to cool.
"Not in the same way."
Dealing with Heartache
On the eye – One of the many enigmatic features of this remarkable beer. It looks 'unique'. Let's just leave it at that for now.
of a weather system that invited itself into the province for a visit
As I decend into anniversabirthachristmakah chaos each November, I'm reminded that the wedding wasn't the important thing - our marriage is - and that helps me pull the rest of my life into focus.
Who cares if it's not the same? Who cares that I'm not driving down the road in my swanky, oversized, over-optioned vehicle? Good grief, did you read that? It's totally ridiculous! Who cares?
Be warned. Humanity loves to earn things. We love to receive what we feel like we deserve. That gives US glory, when God only gives out Salvation for FREE through His Son, Jesus Christ. Wow!
Also do you notice how he uses the word manage without explicitly condemning it. I may be reading too much into this (not really when you take it in context of everything else he says) but it seems to suggest that he thinks it is the government’s job to manage us, just so long as it’s him doing it.
Consider your own story, how you arrived
Right, I'm off to iron those shirts and watch Man V Food... I just love that programme...
“It could be!” she replied with a big smile, even though she’d only just thought of it.
Take care buddies and see you all soon! Till then, Happy Cooking and Happy Blogging!
Inspires the poet with a love as lone
I’m really trimming things down here, the convention was well worth the price of admission. Like most things, it’s better if enjoyed with the company of friends and if there are particular events or people you want to go see. Things I didn’t do at the con that I would have liked to do? Get some autographs. Edward James Olmos (Battlestar Galactica, Blade Runner, The West Wing to name a few) was there. I would have loved to score his signature, maybe on my board game copy ofBattlestar Galactica or on my DVDs of the show. Probably not the game, since I haven’t been able to play it as much as I would like and having a signature on it would mean I’d probably not play it all in order to protect it. Same with getting an autograph from George Takei, Summer Glau, Adam Baldwin or Wil Wheaton. Katee Sackhoff was supposed to show, but apparently had a schedule conflict and had to cancel. It’s an understandable thing, they try to show up for fans, but they also have to work for their living. If a film offer comes up, they have to accept even if it means that they have to give up a prior commitment.
He talked a little about waiting and about the bitterness and envy that can build up and kill the fun of the game that is writing! Game? Yes...it's fun. It's meant to be fun! I'd almost forgotten that...almost...
SASHA
Kuntī profoundly asks Kṛṣṇa not to leave.
of Wildlife AGAIN and they said
A pretty picture is not all I brought back from Chattanooga. While it is truly beautiful there, I now have over 150 books waiting for a good home. I’m donating them to doctors’ offices as fast as I can so the newly diagnosed can get their hands on the book as soon as they’re diagnosed, but I’m not fast enough! Contact me at myckdexperience@gmail.com for a personalized copy of What Is It And How Did I Get It? Early Stage Chronic Kidney Disease for the discount price of $10.00. (It sure is a good thing I’m not in this for a profit.)
Just as soon as I’m done singing this song.
Maybelline Instant Age Rewind Eraser Concealer in Fair
So it was decided that I would head home to get some more blankets and buy the food for them as their food was stolen. The camp ground is in the National Park and was only 1/2 hour away. I was feeling really unwell so I just drove in my Pj's and hada protein shake when I got home. I was hungry but scared to eat. I got back about 3 hours later and then slept for a few hours in the afternoon beccuase I still felt like the dogs dinner.
The new books I ordered finally arrived and I'm having a great time reading them. Lots of really great information! It will take some time to master some of the techniques described in these books but it will certainly be worth while.
These songs are a great way to personalize your wedding, without having to craft something or spend any money. Here are some creative song choices I’ve heard recently:
I saw people completely absorbed in their kids to the point where they seemed to have lost themselves.
Left to myself, I do not have the power
Awards are special and I don't take them for granted. When we give awards, we think about the people we give them to and that means we have made an impression (good, bad or indifferent - hoping good).
Click around some of the posts.
So why can’t the Irish nation be told about any threat made against its ministers or sovereignty? After all we are now 14 months away from 19th November 2010. Surely the sensitivity of any market information that might have pertained so long ago, has now faded. Although Gavin Sheridan intends to appeal the decision, presumably the Department of Finance still has the letter…
It’s almost laughable. That is, if Monterey Bay Aquarium was selling its seafood stock for human consumption, it would receive a “red” rating by its very own standards.
Citing the Audit Bureau of Circulation, uppercaise posted a list of the Top 10-selling papers.
This week, at an end-year celebration of a Bible Study group, a woman shared what she learned by studying David’s life. She described putting on her muddy boots, the sweat pants she doesn’t care about and the raggedy t-shirt that means nothing to her and thinking nothing of getting down into the dirt.
A place that deals in salvage.
That is what their visitors have achieved; that is what they have done to this confident, modern young woman. Like a stain the story is spreading across the district. Not her story to spread but theirs: they are its owners. How they put her in her place, how they showed her what a woman is for.
E. Bulwer-Lytton – The House and the Brain
Jared: He died before I was born. My Grandma and Grandpa tell me I was his gift to my mother.
This brew got a score of 32.5/50 at the Bluebonnet Brewoff. BJCP Amber Ale style. I think it is a good one for those people not into huge flavor. It is rather mellow as homebrews go, but that makes it a good drinkable beer.
“Do you remember the four lines before that quote?” I asked.
He was skeptical about what the response of the people would be.
Okay, I was going to write a whole thing today about how I’m trying to catch up with comments and how I’ve received a bevvy of awards and have yet to respond to them, but then I came across what I’m about to show you. I am literally trembling with excitement as I write this piece and share this with all of you. It’s glorious. Sometimes democrazy – oops, democracy – is wonderful in how it allows everyone to have a voice, even the ones who have just stepped out of an insane asylum and who get their political information transmitted by aliens through the tin foil on their leftover turkey pot pies. This is just so good, I had to share it. Here’s what I suggest you do. Read my commentary first, in case you are at work or to just get an incredible overview of what’s in store and then watch the video. Oh — and be sure to take note of the black-haired fellow sitting directly behind the crazy lady talking. He’s laughing his ass off and it’s a sight to behold.
+Social: Social networking is experiencing rapid growth in LatAm
Even if you don’t call yourself a Batman fan.
The timing of the trip, administration officials said, was dictated by the desire of both presidents to sign the agreement before a NATO summit meeting in Chicago later this month. But it also came just four days before two big campaign rallies that serve as the symbolic kickoff of Mr. Obama’s re-election bid, which will emphasize his success in ending the war in Iraq and winding down the conflict in Afghanistan.
This yield 64 ounces of mildly tart tea, which I'll drink all day. When I want to take it to the office, I mix the dandelion tea, cranberry juice, and lemon in a large Mason jar, and then combine the mix with water in a pitcher I keep at work. Calorie-wise, it's almost the same as water: about 40 calories in 64 ounces.
Just like the Makapanspoort murders (which I’ll cover in my next posting), this story is also a mixture of truths and untruths.
10His intent was that now, through the church, the manifold wisdom of God should be made known to the rulers and authorities in the heavenly realms, 11according to his eternal purpose which he accomplished in Christ Jesus our Lord. 12In him and through faith in him we may approach God with freedom and confidence. 13I ask you, therefore, not to be discouraged because of my sufferings for you, which are your glory.
Such a cute photo - wish mine were that little all over again - I love babies!!
Herencia explores the contrasting extremes, and irony, that Los Angeles is the world capital for both cinema and the porn industry, Cannes hosts not only the film festival, but simultaneously hosts the porn film festival, and the same industries are also the end market for the illegal labor, drug dealing, human trafficking and arms trade that drive the conflicts just 2 hours south, on the other side of the border: The US as the worlds largest “gated community.”
The middle period of his writing, from ‘Human, all too human’ published near the end of his tenure at Basel until ‘The Gay Science’ has more French influence and extols reason and science. In this period he experiments with the genre of his writing and distances himself from his earlier influences.
Ray Wylie Hubbard: Live And Die Rock 'n Roll
o Hotline operator
It's just plain silly. Once upon a time there was a princess that lived with an eyeball. The eyeball kept jumping all around the castle and then it was the princess' birthday. And the eyeball was jumping around the castle too much because it was excited. And then the princess said, "Oh, please would you stop jumping around because I have my first guest." And then the eyeball said, "Sorry, this trampoline is so springy that I can't stop jumping up an down on it." And then the eyeball said, "Woo hoo! It was also my birthday present because don't we have our birthday on the same day?" And the eyeball said, "My family is coming for my birthday." The princess turned 11-years-old. ~Sylvia
“I understand that some people are not happy with the prospect of an Islamic center opening in Manhattan, but relocating it to public property raises significant legal issues,” said the Rev. Barry W. Lynn, executive director of Americans United. “Whether the governor is talking about a gift of public land or a sweetheart deal that gives one religious group a special right to purchase government property, it’s wrong.
Have a happy scrappy day!
The image above is from a new leaflet paid via the Chairman's English Fair Fund for this cause.
The rest of the day was spent having tea in Tunbridge Wells, and as the rain really started coming down we took refuge in a teashop in the Pantiles and succeeded in having a very nice time despite the British weather!
Of a daydream, once beautiful
me: Kind of. But it’s pretty naughty no matter how you use it.
This episode ends with Riki walking in the rain. He’s upset that he wasted his money on drinking because…
Abort a juggernaut
Falsies:
so that night we applied.
Upon watching me attempt to play Angry Birds, Jeremy decided (accurately): "You're not very good at it."
And, in what can only be described as ‘unusual’ the contract allows for Mark to swing the taps over to anything his heart desires and wallet affords in order to promote beer and food through his regular Beer Blokes-hosted Beer Dinners. How nice is that?! So, in order to present a themed dinner, Mark can tap a variety of local or international beers other than those wrapped in the contract.
I know there are people right here in Shelby County, and nearby, and up yonder a little ways, in just as desperate straits as people in Nashville and Middle Tennessee – and in some cases, maybe more. But still, overall – as a whole – we got off easy, here in Memphis, this time. The tornado warnings here that same weekend were pretty scary, but the last time we had a really bad storm like that, I saw debris on the street and trees pushed over dotting the landscape on my little route from here to Kroger. This time, the following Monday, I think I counted only one house that had some limbs on the curb. The north part of the county got slammed, and there were spots of bad flooding even here in the central city – but still, overall and as a whole, the majority of us, we were fine.
(He's clearly frustrated with me.) Part of the reason we do this (TTWD) is to be open and honest with each other. COMPLETELY. It is not your job to pull it together and hide from me. It's your job to tell me when you are struggling or upset. I need to know.
as the youth proclaim a parrot's polly
Thank you for all that you are to my life...
Not surprisingly, Orthodoxy is not well adapted to modern existence. You may or may not like it. Orthodoxy does not care whether you like it (or it should not). There are many drawn to certain aspects of Orthodoxy – conversions are commonplace today. Conversions that are similar to the consumer-variety – those that populate the world of denominationalism (and non-denominationalism) are not unknown – but they are productive of but three things: unhappy Orthodox, former Orthodox, or former consumerist Christians. It is this latter that is the proper goal of the transformation of the mind (Romans 12:2).
07) To Forgive
I remember: everything except when I choose to forget
“Another associate was also discharged, I won’t state reasons. I will say every associate in every store must choose every day whether they want to be part of the solution or part of the problem… Now for those who choose to be part of the solution and come to work doing their best everyday, they can stay here as long as they want and we are thankful to have them! Sure people trying hard make mistakes and we can work with that provided they are mature enough to own up to their mistakes and to learn from them…”
When we fall in love ……
Look for updates soon.
I may like Lady Gaga, but I'm pretty sure I was randomly referring to cherries in my sentences long before she was.
Different Logon Account
The flying experience takes more time and is probably more expensive.
Easter came and went. It was low key and lovely. The Bunny stuck to a strict $40 budget for a new swim suit each, some pool toys, and new books (no candy, because we're mean; also, we prefer baked goods and I made lots of those). So the kids are set for summer and I can finally stop reading "Bark, George" every night.
she'd love the smell of lush green ...
My plan wasn't rocket science; I just went there equipped with all sorts of locker organizing goodies:
David Quilter – Greeves
I took some absolutely adorable photos of some brand new babies,
2) Garlic – 5 cloves, cut into thin strips
While supportive of its objectives, members of the Senate have referred the bill to the house committees on human rights and law and justice for review, with a report expected to be presented in late February.
butter scotch (small)
-Place it in a tray lined with parchment paper and refrigerate for 1/2- 1 hour.
Tapper: will they vote for you?
In the past few weeks I have come across people who would have been great witnesses, in addition to the ones that I already had.
If Italy or Spain were to go down, it would wipe out major banks all over the globe.
I don't like all of it by any means, but I love it being there. I went into town last week for my usual Lifeline shift and took the camera with me. And now I have enough street art for several weeks - from just one part of town. Some of these have been here for a long time, and others are more recent installations.
The ANC has responded to this problem by repeated attempts to unseat the DA from the city of Cape Town and the Western Cape - but the DA has entrenched itself still further. It has launched its own newspaper, The New Age, but the effect is miniscule, the paper loses money every day and even it has begun to voice criticisms of the ANC. And it has brought in the new Secrecy Bill - though this will clearly alienate the press even further. So none of these steps work and, indeed, they are likely to be counter-productive. The re-election of Jacob Zuma as president - still the most likely outcome - will almost certainly deepen public cynicism still more.
- Anchor Steam
Editor’s pickLeading up to Star Wars Day on May 4 (as in “May the Fourth be with you”), the Bricks celebrates with three free events; there …Kick Start My Art presents the “I’d rather kiss a Wookiee!” art show with more than 30 Florida artists bringing Star Wars from the …Price: Free.The Bricks
ing a patron, a gay Saudi prince.
For the soup I used Amy’s Organic Light in Sodium – Cream of Tomato Soup which has been my Tomato Soup of choice lately. Not only great tasting but it’s only 110 calories and 19 carbs! I left the Soup info and description at the end of the post. For dessert later a Jello Sugar free Chocolate Pudding topped with Cool Whip Free.
At last! A Canadian poet writes about this country’s involvement in the Afghan war, and does so with skill and keen insight. And cunningly timed for release during National Poetry Month. Wayman has always been a political poet, from his earliest days striving to reintegrate the presence of working people in poetry. Now he has set the national record straight, creating a poetic testament that will serve to refute the glossy official version of events that will likely be crafted for the history books.
After sending my friend Alex into diabetic shock from pain au chocolat (Penelope's), peanut butter cookies and cocoa with marshmallows (City Bakery), and doughnuts (Doughnut Plant), it seemed only appropriate to bring her to the Dessert Truck. She and her husband Nick live in San Francisco and introduced me to the salted caramel ice cream at Bi-Rite Creamery, after all. Tit for tat and all that.
SAA’s head of group corporate affairs, Robyn Chalmers, said that in the past “individuals” were able to abuse the Voyager system because of “control weaknesses”, but that “new internal controls” were put in place to avoid this. Employees who abused the Voyager programme were fired, she added. When later asked for comment on Ngqula’s involvement in the reinstatement of expired miles on Epstein’s account, Chalmers said: “SAA is unfortunately not able to comment on this matter.”
Some men have no hair on their legs and some men have a lot. This fellow was one of the latter and it was essential that his leg was shaved before the operation and certainly before the plaster cast was added.
has eternal life,
I still need to find a way to nurture my spiritual side. I think that’s where I’m still the weakest. Usually, getting outside or even just opening the windows in the apartment will revitalize me but this week it isn’t working. I’ve taken enough Psych to know there’s probably something else going on but I’m not sure what.
Amazon has introduced a new customer-transparency paradigm that traditional publishers’ and distributors’ systems were not designed around. They were built around reselling-via-intermediary business models. The snowballing of Internet retailing in all sectors has transformed customer expectations – whether that customer be an individual or another business. Amazon and other Internet retailers have catapulted all of us into a world where we (and we are all customers) expect not only speed, but also information and visibility. Ever since Amazon was established, the traditional book distribution sector has been playing catch-up. And more critically, playing catch up at the same time as revenues are being squeezed by publishers looking for the lowest possible fulfilment costs (and at the same time as publishers in turn are squeezed for more discount by retailers – further diminishing the distributor’s margin and ability to invest in quality I.T. and quality customer services people.
Oh, right.
Signals: Simplex 2903 light plate with Simplex chime & 9806 horn.
Lime Lite
What I don’t like is the Bee wants to bring out Mr. Frazier’s deepest-darkest skeleton while Mr. Hudson gets thrown a softball to the readers.
Funnily enough, I just walked through the campus bookstore, where there was a graphic that was something like “Graduation…I’m outta here!” I don’t understand why people are so welcoming…how can you not love the last four years so much that it actually pains me to leave?
THE SMALLEST TREE
Our happy goats are loved and well cared for at KJP Farm. They get lots of attention morning and night, play in the sunshine, and eat local alfalfa hay and some whole grains on occasion for dessert. We keep the farm small so we can attend to each and every goat and give them lots of room to roam.
- Foreigners who fail to obey a deportation order are to be punished. (Article 117)
As a gesture of solidarity towards those suffering from a scarcity of food, all kudos to these folks. But it seems to me that it misses the mark. The World Bank and IMF define the “poverty line” as £1 per day. It’s a statistic, an average. A bit like saying that most families in Country X have 2.4 children. Chopping every third child into decimal fractions is not going to give us much sense of what it’s like to live in Country X. Similarly, rationing yourself to R12 daily for a week, is not really going to give you much sense of what it’s like to live in the slums and ghettoes of the developing world.
In pursuit for some fish and some hunting we drove a bit further around to the bay which was sheltered. The kids played in the abandoned houses since crocodiles lurk in these waters and swimming is a no-no. We did a huge walk up the beach to a few mangroves and there collected long bottoms or bunybu a twisted shellfish that you cook and eat as well as a handful of snails. The snails are delicious, the long bottoms...not so much.
Available in four pretty summer colours; tangerine, lt gold, rosey mauve and mint green.
Animal Hair – In some blankets, mattresses, brushes, furniture, etc. Alternatives: vegetable and synthetic fibers.
Infamous Scribblers Eric Burns
Coming to the surface, water swirling, inevitable . . .
You can be a millionaire.. and never pay taxes! You say.. "Steve.. how can I be a millionaire.. and never pay taxes?" First.. get a million dollars. Now.. you say, "Steve.. what do I say to the tax man when he comes to my door and says, 'You.. have never paid taxes'?" Two simple words. Two simple words in the English language: "I forgot!" How many times do we let ourselves get into terrible situations because we don't say "I forgot"? Let's say you're on trial for armed robbery. You say to the judge, "I forgot armed robbery was illegal." Let's suppose he says back to you, "You have committed a foul crime. you have stolen hundreds and thousands of dollars from people at random, and you say, 'I forgot'?" Two simple words: Excuuuuuse me!!" While what Corzine wasn't exactly I forgot, it's in the same spirit.
So to make up for the fact that i haven't update my blog in forever and a day, I might actually open a SECOND BLOG!!!
cannot get along with him. We have our differences. We argue all the time. We disagree
God's protection as yet again we thought we were to receive a little baby, but sadly it he was not the baby meant for us. God's continued use of hard things to keep us close and trusting of Him and Him alone.
2 medium tomatoes—peeled, seeded and coarsely chopped
Gabby, God’s Little Angel, flies to the rescue as Sophie attempts to help others but has a little trouble sticking with things. Sophie tries to be helpful by washing the family dog for her mom, but she gives up when she’s the one who ends up all wet. She then tries to be kind by reading to her little brother, but he has plans of his own, which include a splash of cereal right in Sophie’s face! When Sophie is ready to quit once again, it’s up to Gabby to encourage her to keep trying and to teach her what the Bible says about perseverance: “We must not become tired of doing good. We will receive our harvest of eternal life at the right time if we do not give up.” (Galatians 6:9 NCV)
I am going... To really get around to that de-clutter I have been talking about for months! Much needed and I must get in a motivated mood!
This week we're going to spend some time reviewing all the different ideas and techniques we've learned over the last 14 weeks of our quilt along.
The greatest bulwark against tyranny in America has always been the Constitution, which instantiates our exquisitely designed system of private property, God-given individual liberties and free enterprise.
September 2003 after 12 years of marriage my then husband informed me that he was moving onto greener pastures. He moved and took along with him his cow or who also was otherwise known as my best friend.
Ø If: Presupposes that you may not.
I didn't lose anymore weight this week, but I did lose an inch around my waist and hips. I will take that, because that means I am toning up. I like the toned up look. I worked out 3x this week that consisted of high intensity workouts. It involved lots of sweat and sore body parts the next day. My sign of a great workout. I can't seem to battle the non-stop hunger though. Added plenty of protein and still feel soooo hungry all the time. This isn't something I am used to, I have been eating pretty healthy for the past year, I can't figure out why I feel this hungry all the time. Must eat more food, all the time. Ugh.
Double D. was a strong advocate for motorcycle safety and awareness. He was the lead program manager and instructor for Las Vegas Harley-Davidson’s Rider’s Edge® Training Course and an instructor for Southern Nevada Community College. Double D. was tragically killed when a driver swerved to miss a ladder in the road on highway 95 on September 21, 2007. Several motorcyclists have been killed in the past few weeks. Motorcycle fatalities are increasing in the Vegas Valley, often due to road hazards or four-wheeled vehicles.
1st August was the 1st birthday of my beauty blog. It went from Beauty Blogging Away to The Beauty Chat to what is now Navilicious Beauty. This name is final! It was inspired by my lovely friend Paige who can be found on her Youtube/Twitter/Blog.
My issue is how naive the ACLU is. What do they suppose would happen to their goofy organization once Islam has the ability to impose full-fledged sharia law in the US? If that happens then all the public schools will pray since as the ACLU spokesperson noted prayer is one of the five essentials of Islam.
1 gestation
Even those people doing the big traditional Hero Things have told me this, they are just doing one thing at a time and the daily work of it doesn’t look that sexy. There is a lot of blood, sweat and small wins coupled with small failures along the way and usually we are only seeing one small part in that moment of their life.
56Excuse the blush, and pour out all the heart,
I apologize for the quality of the images. I took these at night because I wanted to use the mask so I had to take the pictures quickly!
Roland excitedly tapped Marley on the shoulder, knocking the joint out of his hand just as he was passing it.
Where you go…I’ll go
there; and what they of old could not endure so much as to see they now used
In our particular situation, the piano we were placing the mics in was a formerly white Yamaha C-7 that was previously owned by Natalie Cole. I say formerly white because we changed the color from white to black. Needless to say, the sound of the piano alone is incredible. We placed one mic near the upper octave sound hole about a quarter of the way up the sound board from the keyboard. The other mic was placed on the opposite side of the sound board to pick up the lower two octaves, all according to DPA’s recommendations.
- Rounded top zip
In Acts 1:6-7 we read,
Faded stars are coming back from a distance in the sacred year of the Sigi Tolo
As the Musical Box is the only Genesis tribute band officially sanctioned by Genesis, they were granted amazing access to the original Master tapes of the Lamb. “Me and Sébastien [Lamothe, the band's co-founder] sat down at the Farm studio, at the board and played with the tracks,” said Gagné with a laugh. “So every texture that we were wondering, ‘What is going on here? we could hear, actually.”
Slice the pork and serve with the cooking juices.
Hitachi 876762 Single Shot Parts for Hitachi NR83A and NR83AA Nailers DEWALT DCK675L 18-Volt 6-Tool Cordless Combo Kit with NANO Technology Bench Dog 10-019 ProCut Portable Circular Saw Crosscut Guide for All 8-1/4-Inch and Smaller Circular Saws DEWALT DCT410S1 12-Volt Max Inspection Camera Kit DEWALT DCF895C2 20-Volt MAX Lithium Ion Brushless 3-Speed 1/4-Inch Impact Driver
Do you try to go out and see things when you are in different cities?
Size of baby: Sweet Potato..but measuring a week ahead still so really a Mango! That seems so crazy to me! Love it!
It is night. I am awake. Awaken by the currents flow of feeling. It’s intensity to hit me as my eyes fly open. I lay stock still as the force of them crashes into me. They are like a visitor banging at the door of my heart, demanding entrance. I wonder, if I let them all in, where shall they fit? I am so used to having to fit all I feel into my heart, to keep them there under lock and key. Mine to only let out in my times alone; to dare let them touch me only then, unseen in fear of being caught.
-myself throw a wadded up piece of paper at a sleeping student
The mouse loved the baits. LOVED them. He nibbled the squared corners until they were too rounded for him to bite. We supplied him with more bait, and he ate that too. Like candy! Every morning we would check the baits and they would be eaten. Every night we would lay out more. He was indestructible. He was everywhere and nowhere. He earned the nickname Taliban Mouse.
3M Innovative Properties, +53%
NP-You gotta hear this one song.
I started this blog soon after I found out I was pregnant with our daughter, Hannah. Since then Eric and I have had a lot of growing up to do, and some stretching of our relationship, some really hard moments and some excellent ones too.
Here the Siren rises to a small point of order with Grunes and Sarris: it isn't needlepoint, nor yet just vague needlework, but lace-making, an important detail. There's the scene where lawyer Howard confronts Leslie with the letter's existence. He notes that her story hasn't varied in even the smallest detail, and says "It suggests either that you have an extraordinary memory...or you're telling the plain, unvarnished truth." "I'm afraid I have a terrible memory," says Leslie, pulling away at her lace hanky--reminding us that lace just happens to require a great deal of precision, concentration and memory, in order to keep track of the patterns. It's just one instance of Leslie lying even as the truth sits in front of her. Moments later she will do the same thing, saying "I swear to you, I did not write this letter."
* The new UBC Copyright Office, which will be established to further enhance
Last year, Lilly Ho-Pehling, the vice president of Business Development and Client Services spoke at TBTN.
This morning, I am headed off to some yard sales before soccer, then off to a birthday party! Let me share with you what Emmy and I found last week in our yard sale travels. We found lots of small items, but the best find was a chair. Now, it is not a typical purchase for me, but let me give you a little background.
10. I’ll bet he/she has a special talent. You know like in ‘Rain Man’.
I conjured a curse
Although the book had been read, edited and proofed many times, by at least a dozen different people, it turned out that we missed several typographical errors. In February, I launched a new, professionally edited edition of In Leah’s Wake. But it’s too late. Any damage is already done. With my new novel, I’m working with an editor and I’ll also hire an independent proofreader.
Some form of abstinence is therefore an important principle of morality. Total celibacy is an extreme application, but the same principle also positively operates whenever sexual intercourse is held within reasonable limits such as marriage or even in long-term relationships. Sexual restraint alone does not itself make us pure. We must also seek to be free from emotionally intimate relationships with unsavory persons.
Of the 91 cases where error was found, improper argument and improper examination were the leading types of error found by the courts, but these errors rarely resulted in the court reversing the conviction. (Of the 36 instances of improper argument, only 3 were reversed. Similarly, of 35 instances of improper examination, only 3 were reversed. Courts were more likely to reverse in cases where prosecutors failed to turn over “Brady” material (information that pointed to the defendant’s innocence), which occurred in 8 of the cases, resulting in 7of the reversals. Misconduct was found most often in murder cases (28 % of the cases) and sex crimes (24% of the cases).
For those that don’t share deep and fulfilling relationships, in any area of their, life then it’s important to get clarity as to why not. Is there something holding you back or are you fearful of something that may come with having a relationship? Have you been “burned” in a relationship before and have lost your confidence in what they stand for? I don’t know your story, and as a level of humble respect I don’t expect to understand your situation completely however I will say this – relationships are a two way street, on one side of the street there are six human needs to be met, and they are, in no order, significance, certainty, variety, love, growth and contribution, the later two being of the soul, or universal conciousness, the spirit if you will. These needs need to be met by one partner in that relationship for fullfillment to occur. On the other side of the street are those same needs, and they need to be met by the other partner just as equally. As a point of interest it’s important to realise this shouldn’t be a trade off. The desire to want to fulfil the other persons needs should be natural and without too much resistance. If this underlying principle is not being met then it might be time to start reviewing your relationship and look at improving it or otherwise considering whether it is right for the both of you.
The last couple of days I have felt little or no motivation to read and yesterday (Friday) I didn't really read anything, save for a few articles on the theglobeandmail.com. Its not that I don't like to read, in fact I love to read, but for some strange reason I feel little motivation to do any sort of reading. While I have finished two books this past week, I have really found little pleasure in reading this past week. It kinda feels like the books I am reading are a bit blah and I really am not enjoying them as much as I should.
ROM 1:30 Backbiters, haters of God, despiteful, proud, boasters, inventors of evil things, disobedient to parents,
The Task Force’s director, Commissioner Datuk Mohamed Fuzi Harun, confirmed the arrest but declined to elaborate.
The bough of summer and the winter branch.
I yearn to drink
Specialist Smith
Wednesday: We had a Chemical Technical Analysis lecture in the morning about water analysis. It was an incredibly informative lecture. My group then went to the C.T.A. lab and did different titration's to determine the make up of Munich tap water. One of the interesting steps was checking calcium hardness by adding caustic (NaOH). This transfers the magnesium out of solution (see picture below) so that you can measure just the calcium hardness. The end results showed that Munich does in fact have hard water.
Marvin would be proud!
To whom would I recommend this: Patterson fans, most of them anyways.
Landra’s Rating: Yay!
Maybe the theme of the story is racism after all.
But I would be breaking all the rules of blogging if I continued on with this extremely long post, so stay tuned for Part 2 of our NYC trip! In the mean time, here are a few photos to give you a glimpse of what we did.
2010.09.15 Afghanistan Kandahar 2 0 Two children are murdered by Taliban bombers.
And, in a demonstration of what I'm talking about, I play dilettante, introducing my reservations and then abandoning further (or rigorous) consideration of them, simply because I have much to do and I've used up my blogging time for the day. I'm leaving you with this treasured shot of two of my maternal aunts, perhaps in their early 20s, both wearing coats they would have made themselves as they were very talented seamstresses. I downloaded the photo from a Facebook Family Heritage group one of my cousins recently established and although it's been scanned from an old photo and is clearly limited, digitally, I love it. Both aunts are gone now, Eileen, on the right, having passed away last year at 90. And here's me, 60 next year, studying my face in the mirror, in photographs, and peering at my aunts' young selves to find myself there as well.
a) be a follower (i will confirm you are a follower by your profile pic after the winner is drawn)
Good Vibrations – Do you feel the spirit?
Rice producing countries are reportedly tightening rice exports due to low production level in the past few months. It is expected that rice production in these countries will continue to decrease due to factors like unpredictable weather condition and the continuous land conversion to accommodate industrialization.
Finally, we sometimes are too hasty to act before knowing what God says. We have good intentions, and we think that we do not need one another; that we do not need wisdom from others. This is what the leper did. He did something believing it was wise. But ultimately nothing contrary to the words of Christ is deemed wise. We must be cautious with our actions. How many times have we acted before thinking through issues? How many times have we acted only to find out that if we had just sought counsel we would have avoided a great turmoil? Even our good intentions need to be bathed in biblical wisdom and patience.
(Sticky misses accession appearance due to adverse circumstances, and Boter and I are at a accident for topics. Afterwards averseness for a while, we try switching seats for inspiration, and eventually accept defeat. Accept to the aboriginal 10-15 minutes… afterwards that, you've been warned!)
The journey from that night to a promising career as a pro athlete is so improbable Dan honors it as a special gift. You can see his mission in the Youtube video he made, imploring his former teammates at Sinclair Community College to donate blood, the gift that saved his life. It was again his mission on a recent visit home when he took time out to accompany the Sinclair baseball team to the downtown Dayton Community Blood Center (CBC) to give a pep talk, and to donate.
This album defines Prince the way we’ve known him for years. It’s the first time we see him mixing funk and rock, mainly punk and new wave rock on this album.
I'm really excited about this new dystopian anthology that's just being released. It says February 14th as the release date, but Amazon's already got them in stock and I've already got my copy on the way.
Acting: 3/5
You're trying to write a novel in a hurry. That means you can't afford to spend too much time sitting staring into space looking for inspiration. Whether you're an outline writer or strictly seat-of-the-pants, I'd recommend keeping at least a rough list of cool ideas that you might put in. Start noting stuff down sometime in September and keep the list to hand. Every time you find yourself staring off into space in November, the first thing you do is check the list.
So many of us, together.
God created, he created us in his image so we must be creative. Mary Daly said it better than I can: “It is the creative potential itself in human beings that is the image of God.”
For all 7 weeks, we will limit our media consumption to 7 hours per week. The exception will be media that is necessary to keep the ministry work functioning, this also however, will be limited and streamlined to checking email, texts and FB twice a day. We will limit the amount of personal texting to only what is vital for real life communication. This one is going to be hard for us!
So we're all putting on our scuba suits getting ready to go down, I don't remember exactly how it happened but a member of our group aggravated the mermaids and in retaliation the mermaids kidnapped her. And then we had to go save her, but the stakes were raised since we had pissed them off and the mission had just become that much more dangerous.
Additional presentations about industrial policy at CeCOS VI will investigate policies that complicate the work of exploited brand holders and responders including the domain name system (DNS) registration process that is abused by phishers as part of their phishing campaigns.
Title: Poison Study - Study #1
From there, the party headed to the market to trade in some of the treasures they had accumulated and purchase new gear. Milo in particular was interested in upgrading his gear, and haggled with a jeweller over three large gems he had recovered after the group's fight with a bull-like construct.
hey honeybees
I don’t want to be back in the States and having felt like this was all a very long dream.
So that's that for the school year! In a few months I'll have 3 boys in the same school in 3rd grade, 2nd grade, & kindergarten. And Maia will continue in preschool, but 3 morning a week.
I Saw Her Standing There
Then some days are like the second picture. I got barely three hours of sleep the previous night. I felt like an awful parent and was exhausted all day. The baby was cranky, the kids were cranky, I was cranky, and it was just an all-around tough day. A day when "three kids three and under" earns its reputation of being tricky and tiring.
Can I make a quilt using only your fabric collection, take a picture of it, enlarge only a section of the quilt and reproduce the new image onto another surface for sale?
I did have a dream last night about Jaxon's big arrival! The only part I could remember was that I had to have him via C section and he was born on December 7 and weighed exactly 7 pounds! Wouldn't it be weird if those things were true?!
It also moisturizes with Rice Extract and soothes with Aloe.
"We're correcting that." William laughed. "You know, we've come all this way just to settle into domesticity."
Nowadays, teams are distributed across the globe, and conference calls have become the only way to meet with everyone at the same time. Although this poses a challenge, web conferencing tools have become advanced enough to provide the feel of a face-to-face meeting.
- that hearing people say they love our name choice is nice but secretly not caring... (I will share eventually)
So there's one option – just shut them out,
We have a lot of projects at home right now, so Doane is perfect for coordinating the to-do lists, supplies, and necessary time lines. During school, Doane serves me well on any assignments that I have, especially during the initial stages.
stored separately. For both counters
In 1767 the colony took its first census and reported about 52,700 people. By 1772 the state was divided into five counties, to which five others have been added since 1800.New Hampshiresoldiers played an active part in the colonial wars betweenGreat BritainandFrancefrom 1689 to 1763. By the end of the colonial period the seat of government was at Portsmouth, and there were 147 chartered towns in the province.
I follow the plan. I modify the plan when needed. I execute the plan. I do well.
To Whom did Paul belong and Whom did he serve? One might well say God, but more specifically, it would be Jesus Christ. Let’s confirm this in our verse for the day. “There stood by me the angel of the Lord.” It wasn’t just any ordinary angel but one of a kind, “the angel of the Lord.” We have before shown that this was Jesus Christ. Paul did not belong to an angel nor did he serve an angel, but God and Jesus Christ.
The experience of writing DARKROOM was like no other. This book unfolded itself and required very little editing in terms of the story. I had a clear idea of the plot, the characters, and the setting, and the high concept (visions in the darkroom leading to the exposing of a huge conspiracy cover-up.) At one point, my trusted first reader (my wife) pointed out to me that my protagonist Xandra Carrick’s voice had changed. I saw what she meant and went back to correct that and make it more consistent. But for the most part, I was typing to all hours of the night.
I'd be delighted to order any of these items for you and can have them delivered to your address in the UK. I'm committed to providing excellent customer service and am always happy to offer help and advice. To place your order, just send me an email or give me a call on 01280 820593.
-Sand Paper
It must be so annoying that people make these comparisons with the original, but it is inevitable when doing a remake and am sure you would have been concious of this more than anyone. This is why I was so disappointed. The original film had a much tighter story, for example, Lisbeth is monitoring Mikael’s computer and spots what he is working on and helps him solve the bible reference numbers problem. Whereas in your version, you felt the need for the daughter to come and visit to solve this which made it all a bit more long-winded and didn’t help the story move as quickly or help establish the relationship between Lisbeth and Mikael.
We have been set free from the bondage of sin and because of His love for us and our love for Him we will do all that He asks of us. An example of this is in Exodus 21:2. “If thou buy an Hebrew servant, six years he shall serve; and in the seventh he shall go out free for nothing.”
“What’s that got to do with anything?”
The Controller after consulting the international agreements on intellectual property including TRIPS,
In the words of Highlander, there can be only one! However how do we know if there is only One out there for us, or if, when it comes to meeting the one that there is more than one person out there?
So what really is this award all about.. the Liebster Blog Award is given to blogs that have less than 200 followers and deserve more recognition and encouragement.
Tunisian Uprising: Islamic Scholar Abd Al-Fattah Idris Responds to Sheik Yousuf Al-Qaradhawi: The Tunisian Who Committed Suicide Was Acting Out of Free Will
Be forewarned, if your child is used to fruit snacks, fruit roll ups and even fruit leather, these will not taste as sweet and they can take some getting used to. But my kids have grown to love the pineapple flavor as much as I do. What a great way to wean your kids from overly sweet snacks!
(3) Okay, but only if I get to watch.
So…..it’s a work in progress. And I also see that I need to patch and paint those two big spots on either side. (OOPS)
I've had so much fun helping out some of my DC clients put together their wardrobe choices and I thought y'all might like to be inspired too!
"It is important that we break with the idea that growth always costs a lot of money and must be the result of expensive stimulus programs," she said in an interview due to be published on Wednesday in Hamburg's Abendblatt newspaper.
NOTE: I received this book for free from Master Books in return for a review and was under no obligation to provide a favorable review.
I get more great tomatoes from this variety.
I sent it. He didn't get it. He was defensive. I sent him a link to Sir Ken Robinson's website because he has some really great things to say about how the educational system destroys the creative process. I thought if he would understand anything, this would be it. He's an artist who knows the system is broken, yet forces his child to fit right into it and all it's brokenness. That's not even the worst part though. He's just not a very nice dad to his son. I know he loves his son very much, but he's seriously lacking parenting tools other than yelling, shaming, punishing, and grounding.
I had to redraw and paint this several times!
This stir-fry is so easy, and VERY tasty... I use...
Record: 25-7
I leaned over to my husband and whispered how thankful I am for his full acceptance of me and support of the unconventional path I am treading. I told him that one day I would get an honorary degree for all of the amazing things I am going to accomplish while no one is watching.
has recently negotiated with the Association of Universities and Colleges of
- Mel, London, 02/3/2012 15:04
What the majority of people don't realize is ,that attitude often create the 'predator-prey" mentality.
He leaves not only his physical family mourning, but his church family as well. He has left us with a legacy of faith, inspiration to be a better person, to do good to mankind and to willingly serve our Lord until the very end.
KH: We played this gig in Iceland for 500 Japanese people on a large cruise ship that was sailing around the world.
I don’t want to be depressed, so I’ll get around to why I’m writing this post: my month-0ld nephew. He’s technically my cousin, but since he’ll be calling me Uncle Jon – and that is particularly weird for a family that hasn’t had a baby in thirteen years – I think of him as my nephew. I have a very small family. This is my first adult experience with a baby. (Wow, can that sentence be misconstrued. The fact that I even thought about that double-entendre means I’m probably not that grown-up.) I never thought I was immune to the baby effect, but it never occurred to me I’d be helpless against it. All I can think of now is the circle of life and gazelles bowing to the little guy. It’s kind of disturbing how one tiny little hand gripping your finger can turn you mushy.
Potato Chips is a universal snack and its loved by people of all age group. This dish can be served as a appetizer, side dish or a snack. According to the traditional story the original potato chips was created in Saratoga Springs, New York, 1853. In the 20th century, potato chips spread beyond chef-cooked restaurant fare and began to be mass produced for home consumption. Potato chips are a predominant part of the snack food market in English-speaking countries and numerous other Western nations.
Apologies for the quality of the photos as it was so dark in there.
4. Tag 7 writers and let them know.
Professional Tip:
Size: 184,198 acres
The pigeons alternated between the basilica roof, the pavement and the fountain.
Hell yea, cha ching!
For some people, children are an added element of the day – they bring joy, laughter, and make very pretty flower girls and page boys. For others, they may be an undesired distraction. But whatever your feelings on the subject of children at weddings, here are our top tips on how to plan your big day whether or not you choose to invite young guests…
Where did you find the large cloche and stand on your kitchen island?
I was about to write up my views on an interesting bottle of lout I necked over the weekend, but I’m going to leave that till tomorrow.
The 6-foot-9, 214-pound sophomore forward will join freshman forward Anthony Gill as the program’s two departures since Martin arrived. Harris was the team’s fifth-leading scorer with 6.8 points per game last season and was the roster’s top rebounder with 5.5 boards a contest. Gill was the third leading scorer for USC with 7.6 points per game and tied for second in rebounds with 4.7 per game.
1. It converts between 120V and 240V. Any of you who have ever travelled outside the US have probably run into the 120/240 issue, and have maybe had to bring along not just plug adapters, but also a little transformer box so you could charge your phone, run your hairdryer, etc. because it only ran on 120V. The Stavol lets me run any of our American gadgets that won’t run on 240V, which is what we have in Indonesia.
This is not about race either. Had Hillary or Howard Dean been in the White House right now, we would be asking the same questions about a failed ideology. Race matters nothing in this. Race has been made a scapegoat for many who cannot find their own way, but I am telling you all right here and now that I know black men and women who have worked very hard to make themselves self-reliant, and can buy/sell all of us, several times over.
So, when Miss C arrived, we of course didn’t have nearly enough diapers to cover us for a five-hour period, but we did have a proliferation of sleeping devices, which is ironic because at first it seemed like sleeping was the last thing on her mind.
4.Jessica Simpson says her impending bundle of joy is expected to weigh in at a healthy 10 pounds. Is she having a boy or a girl?
I'll be doing a big post on which primers I enjoyed the most, after I've had ample time to test them all. Are there any other primers I should try? I've got my eye on The Body Shop, Illamasqua and Fyrinnae so far. :)
OK, so the United States has killed Osama Bin Laden and thrown his body into the sea. A highly symbolic development that gives Barack Obama some much-needed oxygen. For the record, I fully reject the killing of civilians and am totally against Osama's methods and activities. However, I believe he wasn't nearly as important now as he used to be; killing him wasn't my top priority. I also believe that disposing of his body the way the US did was childish and unwarranted; and that the cause of anti-terrorism would have been better served if he had sat before a tribunal to face charges of crimes against humanity. That being said, having him convicted by a court of law wasn't my top priority either.
Well, that’s what we had envisioned when we saw postings all over our condo lobby and elevators, notifying us that for four days, Steven Seagal and the cast and crew from his TV show True Justice would be filming an episode around our condo building. Our chance to finally be discovered! We knew in our hearts that we were meant to be the next Angelina and Brad and we had been patiently waiting for this moment to come. I know…you’re thinking maybe more Uma and George Lopez but keep those thoughts to yourself. Don’t burst our little bubble.
Inside the oven of knowledge and understanding drifts down these lines from a young girl of 14years old and this shows that the country is going to be better.
Covent Garden
Given the deafening silence from Eric Pickles concerning the Local Government Pension Scheme (LGPS) we can't rule out further strike action by LGPS members. Since, in almost every workplace where there are members of the Teachers' Pension Scheme those members work alongside LGPS members, there is a compelling case for coordination between our respective trade unions.
he brought me out of my shell
In the days of film, this romantic notion seemed to be easily understood. I hope that in this day of digitized instantaneous gratification, I can find the courage to separate the two processes.
Back to Boxxxxxxed, then, for Drum Eyes. Imagine everything in the world all going on at once (mostly violin, heavy bass and bleepy computer noises, but everything nevertheless), albeit in a strangely tuneful way. There you have your Drum Eyes. This was (nay, is) an extremely good thing, if difficult to describe.
We’re a long way into the era of none-too-glamorous e-learning apps, and basic webcasts are a commodity and a yawner. But now we’re moving into a time when internet access is increasingly everywhere, wireless, and fast; when laptops and iPads are video-equipped; when mobile devices break down barriers to access.
So there you have it...my celebrations welcoming year 28. And if this birthday was any indication, it's going to be a really fabulous year! Thanks to all of you who sent birthday wishes my way; I really appreciate it! Happy weekend!
In the end I thought I'd try my hand at making some Spicy Pork & Blue Stilton Pancakes.
Evolution Of The Daleks
A victory at the Battle of Boyacá, in 1819, added New Granada to the territories free from Spanish control, and in September 7, 1821, the Republic of Gran Colombia (a federation covering much of modern Venezuela, Colombia, Panama, and Ecuador) was created, with Bolívar as president and Francisco de Paula Santander as vice president.
DE CASTRO AB, PETERSON C. Preventing exposure to influenza: Steps health care workers can take. Am J Nurs 2005; 105: 112.
After we are gone, of course. I'll be back home, in my bathtub, with a dishwasher that stays put.
Atop you’ll see the beauty of life
Finish reading Gatsby by Wednesday.
Time is going by so slowly and I haven't even started the dreadful 2 week wait! I was given great news today at the clinic, that next Friday will be the big Transfer Day!!! Yay! This is not as cool as you'd think. I am glad it's on Friday because then I'll have three days of bed rest, but it's hard to risk the pain we will feel if it doesn't work. My mother is always telling me to think positive and I really try! I am always the one that thinks of the silver lining, but this is hard. I like to think that the 5 embies are all bundled up in the freezer together and they're all safe. What if it's my whom! What if I am uninhabitable! I am determined to prove myself wrong though! The pregnancy test is set for Feb. 12th! It's a Sunday, which is good because last time I was at work and had to try to keep it together.
Bankruptcy, receivership or insolvency
For Your lovingkindness is great to the heavens (God’s grace is infinite)
These are my measurements and my own tastes, please measure to your liking. If you don’t like sweet taste,omit the brown sugar. Nothing is exact science.
In arguing against the injunction, Samsung — which is also a huge components supplier to Apple — said Apple’s supply cannot keep up with market demand for smartphone products. Koh recounted the argument in the redacted portions of the ruling.
This photo is from last October..Before I lost my camera..I love the clouds. It was such a Monet day..
The Malaysian Bar does not countenance the belligerent conduct shown by a number of the participants. However, we express deep and serious concern as to how the police responded. The police displayed a lack of restraint and proportionality, reminiscent of their actions at the Bersih 2.0 rally on 9 July 2011. Instead of displaying action to calm the situation, they instead aggravated it and contributed to the escalation of the conflict.
OG: 1.050
Punched butterlfys from Martha Stewart Punch
Think of the money that could be saved by reducing the Valuation Office's activities with respect to business rates, as an executive agency of HMRC it's officers could be assigned to other duties such as investigating tax avoidance and evasion ... but that's probably too simple a solution for 'Sir Humphrey' and his board even though HMRC's Vision Statement includes this statement:
The school requires kids to get a booster of the Tdap vaccine when they turn 11. I made the appointment, and since he was with his dad, I called yesterday morning to tell him I'd pick him up from school and take him to the appointment. I could hear the disappointment in his voice. :-(
The first beer was a golden (a beer whose color landed it on the other side of "pale" in the beer spectrum), and its brewer was Dave Logsdon, who left the brewery the next year to found Wyeast Labs ( a yeast manufacturer critical in the rise of American microbrewing). In came Jamie Emmerson, fresh from Seibel, and the future flagship Full Sail beer, Amber.
Well overall I think Author One has done a good job with showing here and creating a sense of place. I am aware this is part way through, so the reader will already know who the characters are and what the quest is, but there is a reminder and a sense of urgency here, giving the scene function. Good.
We hung 80 feet of garland, we felled 14 small trees, we dangled 30 lanterns, we sustained ourselves on nothing but pita chips and pirates booty in a cabin with no electricity or running water, we braved the outhouse- we pretty much moved mountains. Thank you to Frankie, Siri, Liza, Katie and Frank!
I think people over think this issue. Jesus said that there are just 2 commandments that summarize everything God asks people to do. They are, love God and love others.
I hope everyone has enjoyed following PatriotCast so far. It has been a year since I signed up for my personal Twitter account and eight months since I registered the PatriotCast account. In that time I have noticed many other historical Twitter accounts and some that even reenact historical events in real-time. I am glad to see so many others are “retweeting” history. I created a directory of these other historical twitter accounts. Let me know if I am missing any and I can update the list.
"Well, um, I guess you better just read out loud then."
The footwear for Act II is more utilitarian: flat, brown, stiff and unyielding. And yet, it is when wearing these shoes that Agnes, at least for short time, gives herself up to the joy of the moment.
Happy Mother's Day!
** These kits are great for those who don't have a lot of time and like quick easy cards!!!
A short while later, the kid came into the kitchen and headed to the pantry for his usual “pre-dinner teenager snack”. He rustled around in the pantry for a few minutes and then screamed out…
...provided you have an extra finger on one hand, but anyway...
1. Something - Higher Beings Command
I'll give DA a break because actually there are relatively few people/organizations who care about my plight. But before I delve deeper into my special situation, perhaps you should know more about it. Let's go to bullets, shall we?
As you've probably heard there have been 43 towns in my state of Victoria, affected by flood waters as well as some areas of NSW and Sth Australia. All together 5 states of Australia have been affected but to date the worse affected areas have been in Queensland. I will be making and donating quilts through Oz Comfort Quilts and documenting the donations here. How many and how quickly I get them made will depend on how many blocks are donated. But this is a marathon and not a sprint so please don't feel pressured to make and send blocks quickly as it will be some time before the people are in a position to accept quilts as they have no where to store them at present. I will be delivering the quilts through local contacts so they don't become stockpiles in storage, but actually end up with the people who need them. I found that this was a vital part of the bush fire quilt appeal, that I gave them directly to locals who worked with their community and I knew that the quilts were given to those to whom they were intended.
“That’s just a senseless riddle. How can I use that?”
sharp
Christian persecution is on the rise. Never before in my life have I seen so much of a blind culture. Not only do whites want to turn a blind-eye to the genocide of the white race, Christians in America are turning a blind eye to our persecution. Ive been making a career out of talking about our persecution, but it needs to be said and someone needs to talk about it. So many are fearful.
Perhaps the most useful things I bought with me were a Russian hat - particularly important if you're thinning on top - and some antibacterial handwash (some of the boxes have rat droppings in them). Next week I'll also have some skiwear, so I should be okay.
10. Prayers for the General overseer.
THE ULTRAMAN KIDS make their TV debut, an animated series aimed at the younger set.
While I might not see them for a while, I do know something that I will see–The Cover. It’s also an anxious time for me. I’m on pins and needles, obsessively checking my email, to see what the cover designer (for me that’s the super-talented Jenifer Ranieri) will come up with. What will Led Astray look like through someone else’s eyes? Will it invoke the mood I’m going for? Will it say romantic suspense? Will it be love at first sight?
“I’m sorry,” she apologized. (Dialogue shows that she’s apologizing)
Back in the days when I was young, the ingredients came together so easily and there was so much enjoyment and fun.
Lucy, one who always appreciates a good research project, came as Herbert Hoover. It was unfortunate, she said, that he was so disliked because he'd done so much humanitarian work. The Great Depression rather put a damper on his presidency. He was also the last president to speak two languages fluently. And would you have guessed his other language was Mandarin?
According to Clark Howard, however, the true number of Zebra murders was “just under 270.” And all of the Zebra killers but the four convicts and Anthony Harris have remained at large, ever since.
Dude way to throw me under the bus!
Masked behind religion and
* The Budget deficit is expected to have jumped to $189.0 billion in February from $65.4 billion a year ago. The budget deficit numbers are extremely seasonal, but are not seasonally adjusted. Thus month to month comparisons are worse than useless. Much of the increase will be attributable to the deal in the lame duck session that continued the high end of the Bush tax cuts and also cut payroll taxes by 2% this year.
The story goes that Sahm was offered a chance to become a member of the Grand Ole Opry, but that his mother said no -- she wanted him to finish junior high school.
If you’re BAPing at Bishop Woodford House it’s well worth getting there at lunch-time and taking the time to go round the stunning Cathedral before proceedings start at 4pm-ish. As you will read in my sermon illustrations here my visit on a stunning spring day, had a profound effect on me. If you say you are attending a BAP at the Diocesan Retreat Centre the Cathedral staff will let you in for free! Take a small camera, as you see, it’s worth while!
I found a pattern for the rainbow fish online. The kids used watercolors to paint the fish and then glued on some glitter and a googly eye. I had them glue the fish to colored paper, if I was to do it again I would have them glue the fish to card stock.
That's right. You heard me right.
the Angie Lewin book and some red mittens ...
Speaking of paint, remember how much I loved the Sherwin Williams paint on the kitchen island? Well their paints are 30 percent off through the weekend if you are a preferred customer. (At least at my store.) All you have to do to become a preferred customer is give an email address! (I’m pretty sure anyway. I may know nothing.)
Recently, Caroline asked me where I got it from. When I was twelve-years-old my best friend, Suzanne, went to London and brought it back for me. The first time I wore the apron I remember my mother pointing to Kensington High Street, the tube stop she and I my father used when they lived in London years before.
I need to 'ass'certain the correct answer to this question because if my booty shrinking is going to cause further shrinkage of the fancy panties, I will for the love of womankind and my sanity stop working out and eating right. This only seems fair because if the unders are going to fit the EXACT same no matter what size I am, then TO HECK WITH IT. Life will be much more enjoyable with a Five Guys Burger, fries and milk shake in one hand while the other picks my seat!
We’re not fit for the exact same type
Also, I would like to mention that I have some cross stitch patterns listed on the shop. If you see anything that you like, I would also be very happy to trade for some other cross stitch patterns that I don't have. I fell out of cross stitch for awhile and have just recently started up, so anything that you have that is a few years old I might be interested in. Some designers I like right now: Blackbird Designs, Birds of a Feather, By the Bay Needleart,Carriage House Samplings, Goode Huswife, Little House Needleworks, Plum Street Samplers, Prairie Schooler.
Hey loves.
Crying, scared, talking to the mans sgt, glad he was never tracked down
It is you I am praying to be here
If you don't have a recent back up, stay up all night recreating the book from an older back up and consider it a useful lesson. I recommend you don't tell your editor you lost the file - they will think you are a bozo (and they will be right). A virtual dog ate my homework. The physical lack of a computer might cost you a day while you track down a library where you can use one, or one you can borrow or lease. You can probably catch up that day, but if not you must explain to the editor what has happened and how you are solving the problem and how long it will take (no more than a day, remember)
During my talk, I touched on how some unschooling newbies are looking for guarantees. "Do unschoolers go to college?" many ask. My personal question back in my own newbie days was "What if I ruin their lives?????" (Who's a drama queen, me? Naaah.) The answer to my question was, "What if you leave your kids in school and that ruins their lives?" My answer to the college question is, "Do high school kids go to college?" Some do, some don't. Unschooling is no different and offers no guarantees (except that your kids will know a lot more about what they want and enjoy than your average high school grad).
I have a giant poster up on the wall,
12. Fiore Tra I Fiori (00:30)
“No worries mate, you spoke to me and it’s just behind the door in the office, got some ID? That’s fine.. help yourself!”
“How much does the city want to dump on Maspeth?” asked Linda D’Aquaro, whose son is asthmatic. “If you have alternative sites, why don’t you take it there? We’re already suffering.”
Massive amounts of money needs to be invested in the "hard stuff" such as pipelines, pump stations and power stations, all of which have limited lifespans, he said. "We need to understand what's about to break and what we're going to do about fixing it. That's something we really need to get on the agenda."
so leave us a link to your own blog + it'll be a superfun way to meet new folks + share your writings with everyone!
Adam may be smart when it comes to Chopsticks, but he obviously knows very little about Isaac Newton. He lands on his head, giving him a severe concussion. And the next thing you know, Adam is “normal.” He can no longer ace the impossible tests. He can no longer play the piano like Mozart. He's just like every other kid.
Deschutes Brewery and Boulevard Brewery have announced that they will be collaborating on a beer this summer, to be brewed separately at both breweries and released simultaneously to the thirsty masses. First thought? Marty McFly and Doc Brown; two great forces coming together, complimenting each other in order to produce a truly epic result (“Ronald Reagan?!?!” The actor?!?!”).
Immigration Minister Jason Kenney said Mulcair and Rae are wrong.
We are very excited to bring you the following lineup of challenges for the rest of 2012:
Plum (Clay Cream) Liners are my weakness. I love the gritty deep purple gleam they seem to bring to my blue eyes. This plum brings enough oomph to be used to create a softer smoky evening eye or adds enough color to use by itself during the day. Either way, it goes on like butter, baby.
The mirror over the changing table was originally more gold toned. I painted it with Martha Stewart’s silver texture paint to make it match with the rest of the silver accents in the room.
-Run to the under-construction building. Climb the stairs up to the first floor.
Chancery Lane Hotel Proposal: Citizens took control, distributed hidden information on the Internet
I hate to use this space for anything other than wildflower postings, but I am going to be doing a great deal of traveling this fall and a number of you have asked me to tell you when/where I might be speaking - both to hear me and to have me bring you plants. This is my schedule over the next few months. If I am near you and you would like more information (or a current plant availability list), email me directly. Some of my wildflowers are in pretty limited supply so it is always best to ask ahead of time.
Jennifer: Yeah me too
307 **15. “The Bar Exam and a Proper Legal Education.” Chicago Daily Law Bulletin, November 6 1998, pp. 6, 20. (Incorporated in Item C-1999(16), pp. 400-04.)
There is much more to say, and much that has been said by others on the matters of Rights and I urge you to read Ayn Rand’s various non fiction works to gain a thorough idea of the concept of Rights and what it entails.
I know right?
Happy end of the week to everyone and for all my Australian friends and family...
5. Measure the vanilla, salt and flour, pour into cream cheese and egg mixture and beat until smooth. Add the sour cream and beat.
Petrified, the blonde looked skyward and asked, “Is that you, Lord?”
While, I'm still a bit depressed over the closing of Superior Donuts, I thought I'd turn to more positive matters. My daughter, who loves to write, got Runner-up in a county-wide poetry contest for her age group. She entered on a whim and she'll get $25: getting paid for writing, not bad. So, in honor of her great achievement, I am sharing 2 of the poems with you. The 3rd poem, which I posted on my blog a while ago, was about Halloween. I'm not saying it's not good, I just really like these two poems:
sampled in stores) by the reviewer.
I have been avoiding the FOTD's recently due to a bad skin flare up which I blame on the darn evil cold weather and silly old me frollicking with new skin care products.
Martin and his wife Shamicka got married on July 10, 2010 inside their Beverly Hills home, having been together for 15 years prior.
YP asked me what I am collecting exactly:
Imagine if you had footprints or fingerprints from your ancestors. How cool would that be?
Pour over me and wash my hands of it..."
a loss at every moment’s turn?
A super collection of work made by English sculptor, Des Hughes, has opened at Manchester City Gallery today. Hughes was given free reign to pick items from the Gallery's collection of paintings & artefacts to sit alongside his work (which incorporates further pieces from his 'Thems' series).
I have more plates that are larger than the plates on the shelf and I was thinking I would use plate hangers to hang them on the wall around the shelf in the order below.
Not in any way that could be measured by their tests and suppositions.
Came to collect it’s toll.
9.) How often do you update your authors re: submission status, rejections, feedback?
Something like that pic from 'Wanted'.
* A kick for Songkick? Live Nation has just launched Concert Calendar, a Facebook app that pulls ticket listings from Ticketmaster and dozens of other ticketing providers, and builds recommendations based on Likes and listening habits on apps like Spotify. But wait: is any of this driving more concert attendance?
the Foodtrainers’ admissions office this category is the “transcript”. What are the ingredients? Where does it derive its sweetness? Is the ingredient list short and in “English”? If we need to Google ingredients, it’s not looking good. How much fiber, protein and sugar are in a food? And it’s not so much making sure that there isn’t “too much” of something but more about how is this going to satiate us?
In the meantime, here are a few cards I've seen in the few days that have caught my eye:
1. "All Gone Dead" – 1:53
All this pain..
much-ballyhooed Comet Kohoutek. It was discovered by Czech astronomer Luboš Kohoutek on March 7 of that year, while it was still a very long way from the sun, and back-of-the-envelope calculations suggested that it might put on a spectacular show. The mass media proceeded to lose the word "might" and fill headlines with claims that Kohoutek would be "the comet of the century."
1/8 cup parmesan
Unnamed farmer's wife 20020817 killed in firebombing on unnamed farm (Sapa), Tzaneen, MPL
5. Do you get nervous before doctor appointments?
fund reserves are exhausted in 2036, one year earlier than was
Make out with all your dumb friends
Sandra Dodd: You're right. If something is true, it isn't true *just* because I say it.
Sheik Yousuf Al-Qaradhawi Incites against Jews, Arab Regimes, and the U.S., and Calls on Muslims to Boycott Starbucks, Marks and Spencer
Although it almost seemed a given what was going to happen to James, I wasn’t expecting for it to happen how it did. Seeing Mary just lose it over her dad was not fun.
And now childhood is overridden with a
Mr Méniére is a qualified medical doctor who underwent some military training in France. Rumours are that the couple are survival experts and also members of a cult known as the Ramtha School of Enlightenment. According to the latest reports they are presumably hiding in the koppies and kloofs of the hilly Karoo Hoogland veld. The couple have South African citizenship but are of French origin and speak with heavy French accents.
So...until next time...Have the Happiest New Year!! May all your hopes and dreams for the future year come true!!
a family member to the Chopras. So ‘coz of Ms Mukerji’s sheer star power she has to be cast in one of those flicks with top stars
“Our campus communities must stand together for quality education,” Hicks said. “I urge the legislature to reaffirm the promise of affordable higher education for the working families of Pennsylvania.”
4 cups Borax
Two months have brought a lot of things. New and old. New frustrations, old feelings, new contexts.. But I think that the biggest thing that two months have brought is perspective. It’s a new one and who knows, maybe it’ll be gone tomorrow. Maybe I’ll get frustrated and momentarily forget it. But it’s still there, I’ve learned. In fact, I’ve always known these things. How to handle these situations. I just had to do a little soul searching to realize them.
Voila! You are done with your thread! Drop your button in, rotate the thread as needed. Duplicate the thread (ctrl+J) and rotate it to criss cross the other thread if desired! My finished product is shown below.
Poehler: Ugh ha.
Romans 2:16 adds proof to the necessity of Paul’s gospel. “In the day when God shall judge the secrets of men by Jesus Christ according to my gospel.” This is that good news that the Lord would reveal to His called apostle.
Outlook made news for its investigative reports of the "Kargil bungle" and the cricket "match-fixing controversy." Outlook has time and again carried many pro left stories exposing it to the allegations of being a "left-leaning" publication.
Happy Wednesday, ladies and gentlemen,
I am loving my slippers and until recently I have to be honest and say that I didn't know that Nature's Sleep offered Slippers. I only knew them as a mattress company. Ever growing and finding new ways to make us all more comfortable. Maybe they'll make a memory foam couch next?...On second thought I hope they don't do that. Then I'd never get off it!
To be a child of God is to live refreshed and daily renewed in his Spirit. It is to be washed clean by Christ’s precious blood and to be set free from the shackles of sin and darkness.
I read from probably 100 authors, so if pressed from those… I’d have to say I wasn’t inspired by Chouhei Kambayashi-san at all. Probably the ones who inspired me most would be Tetsuya Satou-san and Ken Asamatsu-san. They were great inspirations for me. I also read a lot of Chihiro Arai-san’s works. And I can’t forget Hajime Komine-san too. I could go on about all 100 if I had the time, but these five come to mind first. I’ve been influenced by many people that I’ve come in contact with, but these I would say have most influenced my work. Just as long as we don’t say I’ve plagiarized from them, of course. (laughs)
Same look, just different colours. The background was coloured with the seasonal Distress Ink Evergreen Bough. I used Antique Linen and Walnut Stain to colour this flower (inspired by Jill Foster's flower colouring found here) and I covered it with Rock Candy Stickles.
E.M. Reapy is a 25-year-old writer from Claremorris. She has recently completed an M.A. in Creative Writing from Queen’s University Belfast. Her work has been featured in La Bouche Magazine, Flash International and several local publications. In 2009, she was shortlisted for Over the Edge New Writer of the Year Award and she is the founder and current editor of wordlegs online magazine.
dried river beds
All you need is shaving cream (the foaming kind), food colouring, and paper.
Within seven years of its opening, the school had 150 pupils, half of them boarders. (The first registered boarder was Lizzie Lubbock, daughter of former Governor Francis Lubbock.) At this time a newspaper gushed, …“A large number of Sisters, perfectly trained for the duties they assume, are in charge of this school, and they spare neither money nor pains in providing pupils with every opportunity to advance them in the various studies pursued. Here assemble children of all religious denominations attracted by the mode and manner of training girls in all that pertains to mental and moral teaching. There is a purity about the appearance of the buildings and grounds of this institution, indicative of a cleanliness attaching to what is instilled here into youthful minds, and the happy expression of pupils and the love they bear to the Sisters show that they are properly watched over and cared for.”
In his message he expressed regret for not being there for me when I was growing up. The fact that he felt the need to apologize for something so thoroughly out of his control pulled on my heart strings and brought me to tears. He could have fought to be in my life IF he had had any money to speak of and IF he had been a legal citizen at the time. As it was, he was in no position to do anything about it, and I believe my mother had the right to want to move on with her life as well. I have zero blame to lay at the feet of either of my parents. It wouldn't be fair. Everyone deserves a chance to move beyond the past and apologies are wholly unnecessary. What matters is what happens now.
New comments on the Blogger side of things will be shut off at some point soon.
Oh yes, but first the look - black as a stout should be, with a head that clings on throughout being respectable to the image, and the colour of light melted chocolate, which I'm convinced got darker as I drank more. Oily in texture, good mouthful, you just keep swirling the glass to see how it looks and settles. Dark chocolate, light coffee on the tongue, woody and a little smoke. Total joy. Within the creamy sensation you get some vanilla, and then a good roasted end.
Number 3, Director Alan Smithee. Apparently original director Kevin Yagher's version of the film was a lot different, contained more graphic imagery and explained everything that happened, but the studios disagreed and just wanted Pinhead in there in the first 30 minutes or something, so Yagher was booted off the production and had his name changed to the generic pseudonym Alan Smithee. Another guy, Joe Chapelle, was brought on and re-shot some scenes and did things the way the studio wanted. Because you know any movie will be good when you have this kind of editorial control being exerted over it, right? It just spells success in big bold lettering! I bet this is really gonna be something good, what with THAT sterling recommendation…
At something the rest of us can neither see nor understand.
I look down into me own plastic bag. “Yeah, carnation’s. I like them, they stay alive for well over two weeks if you treat them right”.
Look around you, feel me,
The ice is freezing almost enough to hold you.
The game element was there all the way up until the very end. There was no doubt about it. We know "this place" had rules that change and vary according to who the new leader is, moves, timer, countdown, trades, cheats, loopholes, levels, leaders, pieces/pawns, odds, and points. You could also leave the game/experience and come back into it or completely opt out if you're not ready to continue. We've even seen proof of literally starting over in the same position. There were goals of the game/adventure such as slay the monster, blow up the sub or the plane and save the world, and these challenges is what is supposed to liberate you from your own suffering and making you change.
I started out with the quilt rolled, but that meant I had to hoist the stiff roll up over my shoulder, while still fighting the tendency of the heavy folds to pull downward and refuse to move evenly through the sewing machine. I enlisted an extra chair to hold fabric on my side of the machine, in addition to the extra table behind the sewing machine. The roll was still difficult to manage, so when I could, I laid the fabric to the left of the machine flat, continued to fight gravity since my table was not big enough to hold it all, and was forced to stitch only a foot or so at a time before needing to stop and engage in battle with the quilt, forcing it to bend to my will. I was NOT going to let it win, and it didn't. I am the champion!
observed - 8 - infinity
Beach walkin’ yet you yearn to be needed.
her mother would play with Manuela’s curls when she cried in her arms.
Sometimes as a mother my emotions play tricks on me. Thankfully, I’ve learned that emotions aren’t always valid definitions of how I really feel or what I know to be truth.
(Photo, above: Jean Hummler in the cellar of
Is there anything else I can help you with, Gimme?
a sweet gentle sound
Vader: So, wanna go get a drink? We've got some catching up to do.
Here's my inspiration, that I totally forgot I had pinned. I thought I had come up with this brilliant idea on my own, but it looks like Anthropologie implanted it into my subconscious via pinterest when I wasn't looking~
I love comments so when Kathy remarked on her 5'2" I had to think about the celebrities who dress tall at her hight. There are so many more at 5'1" and 5' but that will be for the next one. Enjoy!
Garth Hudson, synthesizer
I realize I haven’t posted a Forum Friday in quite some time, and for that, I am extraordinarily apologetic. However, today I have been thinking on relationships and such, and a point of conflict arose – mostly because I have strong opinions regarding love, western society, and relationships.
When the first European explorers and settlers came to this country, they found Beavers in abundance – up to 200 million of them across the continent!
far better than one should know a neighbor's shower!
It's incredible how much babies use their caregivers as a mirror for their own states of well-being. When Rowan stumbles, the first thing he does--if he doesn't immediately get back up--is look at me to gauge my reaction. I've been pretty good at keeping my cool. But there are times when the bonk sounds loud and I start. And of course Rowan grunts and gets back up like nada. Still other times, I've seen him break down because of somebody else's animated are you ok? response.
1 hittin'
Okay, I am off to get some parts for the AC. Will talk with you guys later! Have a beautiful Sunday.
Preheat an indoor or outdoor grill to medium heat.
DJ W!LD became resident at Circo Loco in 2010 and has since travelled the globe with the brand and spent many lost Mondays at the infamous home in DC10 Ibiza. A fixture on Cocoon bookings, W!LD is renowned in the global electronic network after years spent honing his skills.
and a little wiww for the first day of school!
Hubby looked rather bemused- he was this time of the party. He stated that he had more on his plate than when he had started! It certainly works well as an appetiser- he was ready for the main course! He cannot understand why one would go to so much trouble when they are available in jars!
This very large group of dedicated agents provocateurs rode through one of the villages in the valley, and when they tried to get on highway 90, which runs the length of Judea and Samaria alongside the Jordan River, they encountered Israeli soldiers and border policemen who demanded their return to the village, because the activists had not coordinated their trip with security forces.
We got home late Friday night and then enjoyed a Snyder Thanksgiving on Saturday. Stuart's parents came up and watched the kids and we went out to lunch and went Christmas shopping. It was nice to spend the day with him. We can officially say that Santa is done shopping for the kids and it was very fun shopping for all three of them!!﻿ Clark is really into Christmas this year and it was so much fun shopping for some of the things on his wish list. I can't wait to see him on Christmas morning.
Rachel sank deeper into the ocean. The freezing cold water burned her skin. She thought of Leonardo DiCaprio's line in Titanic about cold water feeling like lots of knives stabbing you at once. It had been a scary enough line to talk Kate Winslet out of committing suicide.
The degree I got from there, and 50 cents, won't get me a decent cup of coffee today. But it does allow me to lay claim to being college educated and degreed.
No this is my sad goodbye. Creative Card Crew was the first challenge I was ever on. Mari was kind and gave me my first shot at showing off what I could do. She was so amazing and has been such a great friend and inspiration. She had just taken over the blog and it was such a learning process for me and I enjoyed every last minute. Some of you know I have had some health problems and well now to add to my mix some want to be family issues. I really love what I do and that causes problems in my home.
Fact; I like pandas; ♥
“Lord Rama, after defeating Ravana, asked sage Vasistha to show him a place of pilgrimage where he could go and purify himself from the sin of Brahma-hatya (the sin of killing a Brahmin, because Ravana was a Brahmin by birth). Sage Vasistha showed him Dharmaranya, which was near the modern town of Modhera. In the Dharmaranya, he settled at a village Modherak and performed a yagna there. Thereafter he established a village and named it Sitapur. This village is about 8 km from Becharaji Modherak village and it subsequently came to be known as Modhera.”
"When Adam delved and Eve span,
Beer & Cheese - $40 per person
Are you your own best friend? I think guys who spend a lot of time on the Guyism website are probably their own best friends. (Especially late at night.)
I used the Inside Out die to cut the word "Tweet" from manila cardstock. I separated the inside letter from the border. I used Distress Ink on an ink blending tool to add color to the two parts of each letter. I added Walnut Stain Distress Ink to the pieces and reassembled the letters. I cut a Tattered Banner from a scrap of white cardstock. I colored it on both sides with an ink blending tool and Tumbled Glass Distress Ink. I inked the edges with Walnut Stain Distress Ink and then stamped the rest of my phrase with archival ink.
and tells me the world will not end
Me: "Haha yes..." (I was expecting him to say somewhere up North or something..I mean Arizona isn't THAT far & it is pretty dessert-y there.)
The Brazilian real on Wednesday touched its weakest point against the dollar since July 2009, hitting R$1.9649 against the greenback in morning trade. That makes a 4 per cent drop over the previous month, making the real the worst performing of any currency tracked by Bloomberg. It has weakened 21 per cent from a 12-year high reached last July.
Fisher Z The worker UK
With a little elbow grease and patience from Mei, who by the time we began folding in the flour mixture, had had her fill of being in the kitchen and more than likely ready to relax for a nap, began to whine a bit to let me know just how uninterested she was in making cookies anymore, we got the flour incorporated, plastic wrap laid on the surface and the bowl of light, peanutty dough in the fridge to rest overnight.
Later some of the wives came to eat burgers, brats and potato salad. These ladies are nice folks. I don’t see them very often because they’re suburban wives, and I’m a singular unit from the Big City (if not slightly suspicious) to the singular GroupThink.
I'm going to bed a happy woman:)
I will be there for two weeks and will try to do a at least a few posts from wherever internet is to be found.
Without him, oh lord of kings, without that supreme person
You could probably ask someone to read this to you as a bedtime story from about age 6, and tackle it alone aged 8 or 9. It's a bit difficult to put an upper reading age on a book that's only just come out, but you might outgrow it at around 13... unless you enjoy fantasy books and/or are an Arthurian fan, of course.
the licks of which filament me.
Publish Date: May 22, 2012
The Butterfly awoke from her nap and low-and-behold, she wanted to get back into the water... surprise, surprise! The butterfly put on her hat and raced outside for more fun. New photos of the fun from the rest of the day follow at the end of the post.
Enemies become family and all that I think I know
In the country of the free.
1/2 cup maple syrup
Just what the world needs. A movie director diverting asteroids towards the earth. Then the last part of his plan will be unveiled, "we just land these suckers in Texas, Arizona, Ballymena or France, ya know somewhere shite, "
‘Is mental illness ever a gift’ was a series of short videos done by Channel 4, spoken by those with personal stories of mental illness.
Working hand in hand with universities and private industry as well as pioneers in digital computing such as Seymour Cray, the Navy, over the course of several years (with Moore’s Law in effect) managed to procure digital computers that were little larger than a refrigerator. Massive effort also went into developing modulator/demodulator (modem) systems that would convert the analog input from radars and other sensors into the digital information a computer could process. Another massive hurdle was to develop displays for the operators. It wasn’t enough to simply show the raw radar picture. The system also had to generate symbology showing which targets were being tracked, and display the course/speed information the computer had divined on them (known as a “vector”). It also had to generate and display the interception vector computed for a friendly aircraft to intercept any hostile tracks. It quickly became apparent that even with computer support, one operator could only manage one or two interceptions concurrently. Accordingly, the system would have to provide multiple workstations for several operators, and accept input and generate output for each one separately. Finally, since the CAP was unlikely to defeat all possible raids, the system had to be able to cue and point fire control radars, gun and missile systems for close in engagements. Since these systems were analog, the computer had to go through another modem to convert its information back to an analog format that they could accept. Basically, the digital information would be converted to a DC electrical current that would vary, and drive a servomotor that energized the traverse and elevation drive motors of a fire control radar or gun mount. Once the track had been handed off, the fire control system would engage in its traditional (analog) manner, though the system still had to maintain its track information on the target until destruction.
More and more interviews I swear I can’t even seem to hear the answers any more. Amazing the number of responses you get from an advert in the Guardian, some of them from the certifiably insane and some just desperate. Apparently the lure of publishing is such that people are queuing up to work with Ted and earn 18K a year.
A.B.'s face lighting up like Sha'lak'o flames when I showed her just HOW excellent her essay on O. Henry was.
Earlier studies found that exposing rodents to small amounts of BPA could change their mammary gland development and lead to pre-cancerous and cancerous lesions when the animals exposed as fetuses – became adults. (note: about 230 toxins many from personal care products and bottles are found in the umbilical cord blood of the fetus according to researchers to which Tom Mower of Sisel has informed the public for many years..
Ever been watched?
Fred's Got Slacks (2005)
Level 7: MP Cost: 55, Damage: 211%, Attacks up to 6 enemies 6 times, 17% chance to stun the enemy for 4 seconds.
AROS (Aarhus museum of modern art) is one of Denmarks leading art institutions and one of northern Europe’s largest art museums with its 10 storeys tall with a total of 17,000 m².
Another organizational value – speed – followed the same path. Welch understood that speed is the key to competitive advantage. So, he abolished most central planning and involved people in the Change Acceleration Program (CAP) with the idea of making people open to change, hungry to learn and anxious to move quickly on new ideas. Participants come to CAP in teams of 8-12 with real problems. Each team worked with a coach who was constantly present and the contents altered between the CAP framework (guidelines and steps for change) and the solution of the problem.
Drawing on examples from her translation practice in poetry, Erín Moure discusses translation as an operation that is not just linguistic, but social. It takes place in a social field, and is a task accomplished through—and that bears traces of—the intervention of one human body: that of the translator. In translation, the “thing” or “meaning” that is “carried across” from one text to another is never purely a representation of the work of the original author. The “new” meaning is part of a social fabric in the target language and is not solely resident in the text itself. What is meaning, after all, if it is not “our” meaning?
But as I lean nonchalantly (and gingerly) against the Poo Gateway, I think... come on fellas. Haul your crap together and do something about it. We are trying to. Being the sort of person I am, I would quite like a set of reliable guidelines. I'd like to feel like you are with me, not against me. I'd like to feel a little less anxious (and eventually enraged) every time I take my son to a doctor.
AS MOST PEOPLE HERE WILL KNOW BY NOW MEGAUPLOAD HAS BEEN CLOSED DOWN.
I think Keller highlights something really important here about Christians and Art. He is echoing CS Lewis and Francis Schaeffer on this as well. But great music and great art can’t lead you to believe life is meaningless because they express something of the reality we are in – the need of a saviour. What better people to show them the true saviour then christian artists in our churches?
I support The Trevor Project. I'm an ally.
Malema's economic policies put him closer to Zimbabwe's leader, President Robert Mugabe, who in 2000 ordered seizure of farms from whites without compensation, a policy that has caused the collapse of the nation's agriculture-based economy. Mugabe's government also passed a law in 2008 to force international mining companies to hand over 51% of their assets to Zimbabweans, and in March, firms were ordered to submit plans on how they will meet the requirement.
Aaron’s application to liquidate the SABC, which was filed on Friday, is due to be heard by the Johannesburg High Court tomorrow afternoon.
Crash teaches the wild, undisciplined Nuke al about the skills of baseball from pitchig technique to the pointless banter of sports interviews all while competing for Annie’s affection. None of them are quite ready for the next step lie is going to bring. Nuke is too immature to handle the big league. Crash is frustrated by jealousy over the opportunity he never got, but Nuke is not taking seriously. Annie does not want to grow up ad have a real, romantic relationship. Therein lies the tension.
"I am happy to inform you that we have published a short ebook on IP, entitled, FUN IP (Fundamentals of Intellectual Property). The book is intended to make IP Learning fun and enjoyable for one and all. It gives a primer on IP converging the interests of creators, businesses, government and the common man. In addition to basic concepts, it expounds various contemporary issues and debates in today's business environment. In summary, the book narrates the IP story of India by weaving together background information, concepts, cases, experiences and public perception. The story is told by an IP professional through the eyes of a person with ordinary skill".Readers who like weaving, or who just want to sample this ebook, can do so by visiting Dr K's website here.
A test group like this would help them catch those little things that beginning beaders may not always know...the little details that a Technical Editor may not even think twice about because they do this every day. These little extras that should be in the "Artists Tips" if they aren't in the actual step by step directions. That is a job I would happily volunteer for...not that it wouldn't be awesome to get paid for it too!
The decorations were ingenious, with hedgehogs, beetles (as in the car!), rabbits, flowers, ships, all sorts, all ‘egg’spertly done (it gets worse, believe me!). I have never decorated an egg before in my life (honest!). Google came up with various techniques, including using food dyes to produce a marbled effect. This, of course, it is not as easy as Martha Stewart would have you believe – if she ever actually does anything herself – and starting with a white egg might have been a good idea as well. Oh, and eggs don’t take up certain commercial red food dyes, although I do now have a recipe for very convincing fake blood, which I will share for a small fee! So for the second egg I dug out some very old enamel paints, and painted another egg black, with golden cats eyes and white whiskers. I also painted part of the kitchen floor white in a careless moment, although a little white spirit soon removed that… Who says never throwing things away doesn’t pay off sometimes!
All is powering along here, Miranda and Boyd are officially twice their weight of when we decided to adopt each other.
Throughout my two week stay in Peru, women seemed to have a greater presence then men. It was women who usually held the market stalls, women who prepared our food, women who we bartered with, and women who gave us a glimpse into the way of life of both the rural and urban Peruvian people. From the mountains of the Lares Valley to the islands of Lake Titicaca, it is the women of Peru who are most deeply etched into my memory.
Hump Day Lesson: Pouting works! I was at Whole Foods bemoaning the fact that my fave flavor of chocolate was not on sale when all the other flavors were…a hot stocker guy comes up and asks me how my morning is going.
No, my problem is that guys seem to use the stall when there is a row of free urinals. I can understand if they are a little gun-shy, not a problem. BUT, if you are going to do that, close the freakin' door. I cannot remember how many times I have gone to walk into a stall and almost walked straight into the back of someone. I think they are trying to make a point - yes, I'm in the stall, but I'm not taking a dump! I really couldn't care less if you are taking a dump. Hell, I take one most days.
Meanwhile, there was plenty of space in front of us and behind us.
SEPTEMBER - This month contains several more pictures taken during our family's "apple-pressing day" in Alpine (with another Heather-Summers-inspired layout). We had a hard time finding a day that would work this year in October, so we were pushed to November ... it was c-c-c-COLD!! Doesn't matter, though ... we enjoyed ourselves, anyway!
7. Shake 'n' Go Buzz Lightyear
Would you rather sweat mayonnaise or malt vinegar?
1/3 cup semisweet chocolate chips
Thank you Rosalie. I am looking forward to reading 'Coping with Chloe', and hope it does really well for you.
LOL, at least I think she will with no socks or slippers or shoes on :-D More of that in a minute :-D
1) Just one more reason to do what you should.
2. Rich and sumptuous clothing or equipment.
Stay with me until the end and I promise to be the Almighty Absolver for you too. I’m really good at it. We used to role play in the church basement.
Basically, I wrote that a crime didn’t have to occur for us to inspect the irrefutable evidence of misogyny and race baiting that went on that night . . . Obviously, some segments of the Duke lacrosse crowd did not enjoy the scrutiny of their world.
The writer is professor of finance emeritus at the Wharton School of the University of Pennsylvania. Comments and questions can be left at www.mtgprofessor.com.
laugh
In fact, it is highly debatable that al fresco dining can actually take place on MacDougal Street. Unless you redefine al fresco to mean putting one table between the entrance to a restaurant and the exit of a comedy club in a space not even wide enough for the table alone.
The Harry Potter films have been consistently above average in quality, and while certain installments were better than the others and vice-versa, the Deathly Hallows: Part Two, and the rest of the Potter pictures are well worth the time. If you’ve seen the other movies, you owe it to yourself to see Part Two and finish off the series. But then you probably already knew that, didn’t you?
Family: Cactaceae
The American Civil Liberties Union said in the church that they were expecting that a fresh national immigration law, authorized into law by Obama, might be a much superior possibility and could be imposed within a significantly fairer way than the Sc one inparticular. Governor of the state Haley accredited regulations last yr, that instructs authorities to contact the feds if they find a suspected illegal immigrant when corporations are now needed to determine immigrant standing.
Fifty Shades of Grey, written by E.L. James, is the first part of a trilogy (yeah, nothing less!) telling the love story of a young literature student (in her early twenties), Anastasia Steal, and a rich businessman, Christian Grey. Mr. Grey is smitten with Miss Steal but, as he is into BDSM sex and she is a shy, clumsy virgin, they have some serious issues. All of them are overcome very promptly – by sex. . I must admit highly disgusting and very badly written variation of BDSM sex – you can find out EXACTLY how disgusting reading some of the reviews, published e.g. on Goodreads (links to my favourites can be found
Another All-Time Classic Television comedy!
This is actually the very first version of M5436 I ever made and that was about 6 years ago.
other side of her apartment into a living space, and advertise for a roommate. Then she would go begging for a job with low pay and long hours in support of someone else’s design reverie.
—There are a few purple basil leaves that haven't frozen yet, thanks to being covered with old bedsheets, but for the most part both the purple and green basil plants are history. You can read more about how to extend your basil growing season here, and find out what to do with purple basil (including my favorite pesto recipe) here.
Alright, Cassandra wasn’t able to write her post for today. First official post on the blog, for shame…of course, I kid. She’s busy covering for her boss, and so today you get a bunch of quotes from one of my favorite philosophers. Friedrich Nietzsche was a German philosopher who said, well many things. I’m not going into all of it right now, but the quotes below run from very serious, to roll on the floor and laugh. I hope you enjoy them, learn from them, and have fun!
This week I'm going to show you how I organized the lego situation. I got the drawers right after Christmas and the boys and my SIL helped sort them out by color. But really today what I want to show you is this fantastic idea (which of course was NOT my own) of letting the kids each have an "in progress bin". See they enjoy using the legos but my floor ends up looking like this:
Step 9: Lay the two large squares on the bottom strip set squares so that the diagonal lines you drew form the bottom point of the heart. Pin so that you will be able to sew ON the marked lines.
Here's an older ad for you German speakers!
pure and white
Hope everyone has had a Brilliant Christmas and New Year break.
Here’s a picture of the actual Bheema rock from the other side.. Arrow pointing the rock
…screaming comes across
First of all Happy Onam to all you gorgeous people. I am craving a traditional feast, but then sheer laziness to make it and the unnecessary exorbitant prices the restaurants are charging for it is making me stick to er, a pizza for dinner. My plans of posting the pictures have also gone awry as I dove straight into work and was left with no time whatsoever. Now I have just lost the enthusiasm to do the same.
I moved to London last summer, and it's now an incredibly stimulating international city. It's rinsing my eyes and making me want to try out new things in my work.
On Saturday Polly Polkadot jewellery will be at RSPB Ynys-hirs annual craft fair. It runs for a fortnight, and I just have to set up my stall and then the staff run the shop and take a commission at the end.
I can’t believe this was a year ago. Some days it seems like yesterday, and some days it seems like another lifetime.
Been down, isn’t it a pity
Chili Mac
If our 22nd century descendants want proof of when America went to hell in a handbasket, show 'em Basketball Wives.
The Noir City film festival just seems to get better and better every year. There's a Noir City tradition of having the Thursday night be "Bad Girls" night, so of course that was the show we decided to get dressed up for. This year's Thursday night lineup featured our bad girl icon, Beverly Michaels (star of one of our Noir City all-time favorites, Wicked Woman), in Pickup. Laura, Fawn and I even made up a drinking game to accompany the double feature, the rules of which were:
The Fly II
Stephen Hawking’s own popular books try to establish a so-called philosophically interested reading of M-theory, string theory and general relativity. There are moments where his reading is somewhat patchy. But perhaps the real thing that is important, and that Hawking succeeds in, is making the current understanding of science understandable to a general public. This is what I would consider the most socially important thing that phyiscists can do outside of their work. Sokal’s perspective by contrast is one where physicists do their science between monday-saturday and then their speculation on a sunday. What succeeds about Hawking’s presentation is that the physics is presented in a manner that has religious and humanistic dimensions, rather than one of a technical ‘philosophical’ merit. Does the universe have a beginning? Does the universe have an end? What is our place in the grand order of things? Is there life beyond earth? Physics goes on well without philosophy’s involvement, however, it should be attributed to the death of the polymath that there are less physicists more interested in philosophy. The rise of continental philosophy that fails to acknowledge the work in physics with any real expertise is also a reason why physicists may dislike philosophy as a whole, that is the whole point of the Sokal hoax in a sense.
no floors
They put a gun to her head and she expected them to pull the trigger. Yet as she spoke to me, it became clear that she was so calmly resigned to her fate that one is left filled with a mixture of horror, amazement and humour.
I did not know any of these people but I just can't get it out of my mind. I realize that things like this happen but I just don't know that I could live if it were my children. To make things worse, the boy that was rescued by the fireman is in critical condition and may die also. God have mercy on them all.
He admitted it would be difficult because I have a caring nature. I replied the only way of stopping outside contact with certain people would be to change my mobile number, but then like an idiot I have also given out my home number to one person because they were desperate to talk, as they could not reach CC! I am also of course working in the same voluntary job as this person, and whilst we do not work the same days, we do on occasions walk to the office together for a coffee after Thursday’s group, but we barely ever discuss the group, unless perhaps one of us is upset about something.
2) Add beef and stir fry till fragrant.
My blogging philosophy, motivation, and experience in ten words?????? Hmmm....
You'd think I like them.
There are only two old JD versions of the song, one of them incomplete. Ian's vocal clarity in them is also relatively unclear; the recording equipment really hadn't been super great at the time, unfortunately. Nonetheless, at least they exist.
By contrast, Facebook threads are self-contained, for the most part. Nobody is totally "anonymous" and there can be no sock-puppets. Many of the participants in any given thread, will already agree with each other since they are from the same social circles, age-grouping and class. However, some of us have a LARGE and DIVERSE number of friends--which is far more likely if you are older (or have lived and worked in a variety of environments, as most older people have). People who hate each other and/or disagree on every single issue in the world, can suddenly and unexpectedly collide on the same thread. And predictably, all fired-up with "likes" (votes from people who agree with any given comment)-- they come out guns-a-blazing. Many Facebook people may not have any other online experience and it is entirely possible they have never before argued with people who disagree with them; thus, they promptly go into ideological apoplexy. This is marked by a lot of "you're crazy!" and "you can't be serious!" because they really do believe this. It's not rhetorical. You can tell they have not been exposed to real life ______ (fill in the blank). Atheists, anarchists, libertarians, Ayn Randians, communists, animal rights activists, whoever. They have heard of them, sure, but they've never met them before ... and they often respond by hitting the proverbial roof, flipping out and calling names.
1 ½ cups tortilla crumbs (I use the ones made by I.M. Healthy: the SoyNut Butter Company. They are dedicated to making products for people with allergies to peanuts, nuts, dairy and gluten.)
It was actually a little distressing for me...so much that I started looking as sofas (stop hyperventilating, hubster, I said *looking*).
Other songs, airwaves! Wish you'd play
The last studio release I put out is based on a story called The Seven Beggars which was written by Rabbi Nachman who was a Hasidic rabbi. He was the grandson of the Baal Shem Tov, who was the founder of the Hasidic movement and that was in the late 1700s. He basically believed that people weren’t really connecting to the Torah. The learning wasn’t real to them. Therefore it started creating an impediment between them and God. And therefore he felt that there needed to be a new revolution in Torah learning and that it had to come through stories, and so he began to tell these stories. I studied his work for about three or four years and it culminated in my records, based on one of his stories called the Seven Beggars.
-Camaal.
Armstrong, R., Glenn G.J., Alamaro, M. “Coordination, research needed in weather science”, Physics Today, Vol 60, Page 10, June 2007.
But I read an article today and want to share it. The writing is delightful with phrases like “…a frenzied donnybrook fight…” and, “The first rule of understanding apocalyptic movements is this: If someone tells you the world is ending, believe them. Because for them, it probably is.”
-On Friday, once we FINALLY got to the hotel after walking 2 miles in the heat (ugh), there was lots of fun stuff to do. I met Chelsea and Emilie in the ATC funshop, and Chelsea told us about Nerd Fighters. The only ATC I made sucked and I didn't trade it, but it was still fun. Then I went to a duct tape funshop and made a duct tape flower thing that looks more like a pinecone, but is still nifty.
**Begin to stuff firmly at about row 25, placing the piece of plastic canvas on the bottom before filling- Make sure your open loops are to the outside or right side.
Day 236 – Ken here (W)(5-5-2010)
If you have a dark colored area you can overlay a lighter colored pencil and cover up the darker color, to some extent (it's hard to get back to pure white, rather, you can get close with a white pencil). This is handy when you are in a small area and you colored it too dark, but pulling the extra color out with your colorless blender would leave a bigger mess than you had in the first place. Just add a dab of light pencil and you're good to go.
I made sure to photograph the scene from every possible angle and direction. That fact that the two dead men had multiple gunshot wounds, is an under statement, -- they were absolute mincemeat! The victims were also armed with 9mm Norinco pistols, and had managed to fire a few shots back at their attackers. Their evidence also had to be collected for ballistic examination. I had scratched around on many occasions in pools of thick fresh blood looking for spent cartridge cases and bullets, but on that specific night I didn’t feel like doing it! I really had to force myself to stay focused. It was dark but the scene was well lit with huge spotlights placed in strategic positions. The scene was also well cordoned off. I noticed a large group of high-ranking Black police officials standing behind the yellow police barrier tape. It was quite obvious that they were eagerly waiting for me to finish my examination and to deliver a preliminary report.
Card # 1324: Adrian Gonzalez, 2011 Topps Update Gold US126, Boston Red Sox (1324/2011)
When should parental concern overrule internet fame, money-making ability and childlike dreams of grandeur? Where’s the line between understandable public outrage and victim blaming? Who is at fault for the life Kiki Kannibal is living and does fault matter here?
A big thanks goes out to our WONDERFUL GUEST DESIGNER, ANABELLE O'MALLEY, for sharing one of her beautiful designs with us all this week!
Here's a reminder about what's on the menu:
For dineLA my friend 'Lindyhopper' - an uber carnivore - sold me on the amazing deal at The Capital Grille (which she goes to every time dineLA rolls around) which offers for $34, a 3-course meal that features a cut of steak that is normally $45 on its own on the regular menu! (The total estimated savings for everything is about $39!!!!!)
We are now older, more mature gamers, and we want games which will uplift us, make us sad, genuinely move us. In short, we want the games to move from their prerhistoric era, and develop fully, to shed their cocoon of blandness, corporate "games are for kids" and blossom into a butterfly.
You want several profit centers that allow you to sell your products and services to more customers. The backend part of your company supports these profit centers. It diversifies your business so you are bringing in money through many different areas. You can’t rely on retiring early if you only have one profit center.
I just love the way it looks hanging there. It looks just beautiful just like I wanted it to look. And see the stain finish difference on my pantry side? It's getting on my nerves! Wayne has to do something about that. There used to be a cabinet butted up to it so the finish didn't darken in that area. Hmmm?
Your enemy may be your best ally.
It's strange, but I don't remember Mr Kadyrov being so enamoured with Russian rule when he was fighting an insurgency against them and killing their soldiers.
A French spy was captured in the city, and hung on the walls as a lesson to others. French morale declined, and when the body was cut down, evidently the Commissioner of Public Safety attached to the army determined that decapitating the body after the fact would some how prove motivating. Uh-huh.
Read the full article:
I CANNOT believe it's only 1 week until you are 1 year old. WOW. Times flies - what a great year it has been :)
It's Catholic Schools Week and today, my children's school is having Student Appreciation Day.
Allow me to illustrate from my own childhood. I was raised in a religious family. I never missed church. I was taught and memorized the Ten Commandments, the Beatitudes, the 23rd Psalm, the Lord’s Prayer plus many of the stories regarding Israel and the Old Testament. But I wasn’t saved. That is I wasn’t saved until I heard the gospel of Jesus Christ.
Ed Champion has just posted a marvelous new interview he did with Carol Emshwiller for his Bat Segundo Show podcast. It's really delightful. Here are some text excerpts, but I highly recommend listening to the show itself:
Achieving “equality” and “fraternity” in India may be harder even than the path that African Americans have had to follow. There are more divisions, fewer resources and huge disparities. But until there is diversity on television screens and printed pages, the promises of the Constitution will be unfulfilled, unthinking prejudice will persist and simmering resentment will grow. Media diversity is a matter of national self-interest as well as justice.
We just had time for a quick pint before getting the ferry back (we were sorely tempted to miss it) when Dave the captain invited us up on the bridge as the ferry left St Mary’s, so I could take more photos for my article.
Given the cultural activities I have participated in, I wonder: what cultural activities would someone participate in if they went to the US? Do they have enough community-mindedness and local culture to keep their citizenry occupied? I feel that the sense of united community here helps to generate respect. I wonder if our Western communities are too divided.
Where are the PATROLS that are supposed to make sure things like this are not supposed to occur?
I have a Tea Party themed piece brewing!!! It's been in my brain for a long time to do a tea party themed piece and I feel that now is the right time to get it going! I've started collecting some things with it in mind. I've had the 2 tea themed fabrics that you see at in the top of the photos for a few years now and have used them in a couple of projects. One was a tea cozy for a friend which I ADORE it was so amazing! And the other I used in a little block that is now hanging framed in my guest bathroom!
Today I decided, after much boredom holed up inside like a hermit, to go outside in the beautiful sunshine and sunbathe. I rarely do that, what with evil rays and all that, but it was just such perfect weather today and I need to get a bit more colour! I took pictures, to. I can never resist taking pictures... :-P
“Imagination is the beginning of creation. You imagine what you desire, you will what you imagine and at last you create what you will.”
HOW: If you would like to donate in-kind items listed above, please contact Laura Kelso, director of community resources, at (323) 254-2274, ext. 251 or e-mail lkelso@hillsides.org
As you can see, I often act younger than I actually am. But I also have moments were I feel a few dozen years older. Moments I’m sure you all have.
Now my head is swimming with ideas and plots and plans. Lucky for me, Renda has published The Indie Writer's Workshop. If you've ever considered writing your own novel, you want this book in your library. Renda has created a fun, comprehensive, easy-to-read and to use wookbook that is going to be my new best friend over the next month and a half.
This Ain't No Picnic
A chimera
SH: I cleaned before you came.
“We don’t want things to escalate into violence or community tension, so we try to address situations like that right away,” added Shannon Powers, spokeswoman for the Pennsylvania Human Relations Commission. “We would not recommend tearing down because it could lead to escalation. It hasn’t, and we’re tremendously thankful for that.”
I always had to force myself to play the Silent Hill games. I knew I would enjoy them if I only tried, but I always ended up playing something else and just listening to the music.
I probably did a little skip over there, but essentially Bokurano is a science fiction anime which consists of hidden meaning and problems within seemingly average children. At first I was pretty turned off with the main plot of the story where these children decide to ‘play a game’ for a mysterious programmer named Kokopelli. He contracts these children to help him play in which 1 person pilots a giant robot and fights another giant robot to the end. However after Kokopelli’s demonstration of this fighting he mysteriously disappears for the entire anime until very near the end when his story is shown in a flashback of utter importance.
3. Collaborator Portland Rawkin Bock Bock my favorite non IPA/ESB beer of the festival.
I was really glad to be on spring break–the hubs and I haven’t had more than one night a week together in ages–but the baby is like in one constant meltdown when she is awake (teething? or she got really used to drinking juice and watching elmo all day while sick and can’t handle the return to normal life) and the weather is so so so horrible there is no place for us to go. I literally did not leave my apartment the last two days. Oh wait, I did go to Safeway once. The baby charmed everybody with her fake crying (sarcasm).
I miss you, but for some reason I feel peace this year, like we've come to an end of a cycle and now I've reached closure. Maybe it's because the Giants again were able to pull off a win against the Patriots in the Super Bowl. Maybe it's because I am again running the Broad Street 10 miler like I did the year you were born. I can't put my finger on it, but I feel like this is how it's meant to be. It doesn't make me miss you any less, but it does take some of the hurt away.
Ryan Katz (QB Oregon State)- Admittedly Katz isn’t on anyone’s “watch list” but seriously, someone needs to take the fall for that terrible loss to Sacramento State.
I know I promised an update on the kitchen today, but this morning I tried a new service that's becoming quite popular in France and I want to share it with you.
Licorice Root Tea
The 2006 re-release also features bonus tracks, featuring a number of tracks as good as those featured on the album LP. In fact, Convent Walls and Wish to See No More were listed on the original album but were bumped due to the time limitations inherent with poly-vinyl chloride (aka records - remember those, kids?).
Since I am Canon shooter, I decided to stick with Canon lenses. I bet you are curious and already know that one of them must be a macro lens, and it is - Canon EF 100mm f/2.8 USM Macro lens. I also treated myself with Canon EF 24-105mm f/4L IS USM lens. Both are excellent lenses. I have not been able to use the macro lens as I cannot find anything tiny small (may be microscopic) to photograph, meaning small creatures (probably hibernating at this moment), however, this lens is great for portraits.
Why do thousands of Chabad "shulchim" go to the "ends of the earth" to feed some Jewish straggler a kosher meal, while ignoring the historic call of reaching out to Jews in Eretz Yisrael who have distanced themselves from Torah?
So, Valentine’s Day may have come and gone, but I’m still feeling the romance, on the page at least. Yesterday, I received a box of a dozen classic romance paperbacks from Avon Books because I entered a Facebook contest on a whim — and won! Then I went to send a thank-you this a.m. and found that Avon was sponsoring a LiveStream chat with a handful of romance authors at a virtual booksigning at Turn the Page bookstore in Maryland.
Although the amount of spica I put on his skin might need a day to settle before this goes in between any sacred pages!
Thing’s just aren’t as obvious after all
And so, back to Pingu…
And you wish you were the best
His mind was on His promise
Chris T: You aren’t just nerd girl, you are hot nerd girl. With that established, my question is about your hotness. What is your favorite cut of undergarment?
D.H: Liam Neeson – Battleship movie preview, could be cool.
Oh, you do? Well, when you want a MANfriend, come talk to me!
watch
Vision from Heaven upon any man or a nation will bring restraint. It’s not a restraint of legalism but rather a spirit influenced focus which produces moral excellence. When you see what heaven means for you to become you will guard vision with all your heart, mind and soul.
Raising the allocation, however, would be tougher, The Bond Buyer reported, because Congress would have to find new revenue to offset lower tax receipts. Then again, it costs more to develop housing in New York City than elsewhere, and not all states use up their volume cap, so there’s an argument for adjusting the volume cap.
Contemporary artists Sean Mcsweeney, John Cronin and Donald Teskey will all be exhibiting work
I made a story book on a roll using My Stamp Box stamps to tell my story. It's all stamped onto calico and sewn on the machine. Parts of the stamping were coloured using Faber Castell Pitt pens (more from them later in the week) and other bits were stamped onto patterned fabrics and stuck on with Heat and Bond. I love that stuff. Anyway, here it is:
That no thought else should ever cross my mind
Some of this will be repeating from the Runweld Guard quest.
Meanwhile, Solidarity also stresses that the problem with the bill is not limited to the removal of the regional demographic profile of the economically active population. In terms of the current legislation, present and future financial and economic factors can be taken into account in determining whether an employer complies with the EEA. The availability of qualified persons can also be taken into account. The new act does not make provision for these factors.
